PART FIRST.
1
BEHEMOTH
PART FIRST
Upon
the summit of a mountain which beetled
in the remote west over the dwellings and
defences
of a race long since vanished, stood, at the
close of a midsummer's day, a gigantic shape
whose vastness darkened the whole vale beneath.
The sunset purpled the mountain-top, and
crimsoned
with its deep, gorgeous tints the broad
occident
;
and as the huge figure leaned against it,
it seemed like a mighty image cut from the solid
peak itself, and framed against the sky. Below
in a thousand groups were gathered, in their
wonted evening worship, that strange people who
have left upon our hills and prairies so many
monuments of their power, and who yet, by
some mighty accident, have taken the trumpet
out of the hand of Fame, and closed for ever, as
regards their historical and domestic character, the
busy lips of tradition. Still we can gather
vaguely, that the Mound-builders accomplished a
career in the West, corresponding, though less
magnificent and imposing, with that which the
Greeks and Romans accomplished in what is
styled by courtesy the Old World. The hour
has been when our own West was thronged with
empires.
Over that Archipelago of nations the Dead
Sea of Time has swept obliviously, and
subsiding
,
hath left their graves only the greener for
a new people in the present age to build their
homes thereon. But at the time whereof we
write, living thousands and ten thousands of these
ancient denizens were paying their homage to
their deity, and as they turned their eyes in unison,
to bid their customary solemn adieu to the
departing
sun, they beheld the huge shape of which we
have spoken. The first feeling which arose in
their bosoms as they looked upon the vision was,
that this was some monstrous prodigy exhibited
by the powers of the air or the powers of
darkness
to astonish and awe them.
But as they gazed they soon learned that it had
a fixed and symmetrical form, and possessed the
faculty of life.
When they discovered that the huge apparition
was animate indeed, a new terror sprang up in
their soul. They gathered about their mounds,
their places of worship, and on the plain, in
various and fearful groups.
In one spot were collected a company of
priests and sages, the learned and prophetic of
the race, who with intent eyes watched the
mighty spectre; and to gain a clearer conception
of its proportions, scanned its broad and far-cast
shadow and marked the altitude of the sun.
Each one searched his thoughts for some
knowledge applicable to the sudden and vast
appearance
.
Not far from this group was drawn
together
a score of women, who still retained
their devotional posture and aspect, but yet
casting
side-long and timid glances towards each
other's countenances as if hoping to discover
there, an interpretation of the spectacle.
Children
clung to their garments and looking up
piteously, seemed to ask if that was not the
God whom they were taught to fear and
worship
?
Each moment the awe increased and
spread; from lip to lip the story ran across the
plain and through the walled villages until the
spectre embraced in its fearful dominion a circuit
of many leagues.
Each moment conjecture grew more rife and
question more anxious and frequent.
In the opinion of many of the wisestfor
even from their souls superstitious misgivings
were not wholly banishedthe apparition which
crowned the mountain was the Deity of the
nation, who had chosen to assume this form as
the most expressive of infinite power and terrific
majesty.
Other nobler spirits, and who drew their
knowledge rather from the intellect than the
feelings
,
believed it was the reappearance of a great
brute which, by its singular strength, in an age
long past and dimly remembered, had wasted the
fields of their fathers and made desolate their
ancient dwellings.
A tradition still lingered among them, that of
that giant race, which had been swept from the
earth by some fearful catastrophe, one still lived
and might, from a remote and obscure lair, once
more come forth, to shake the hills with his
trampling, and with the shadow of his coming
darken the households of nations.
In the more thoughtful minds of these theorists
1*
the vivid and traditionary descriptions of the
mighty herd of brutes which had once tyrannized
over the earth, had left an impression deep,
abiding and darkly colored. The memories of
their progenitors had handed them down as a
Titanic tribe of beings who, in their day, excited
a terror which kindled human fear, and with
it, the best growth of fear, human ingenuity.
They remembered that in that distant age, as
the history ran, a new and majestic race of
heroes, moulded of Nature's noblest clay, had
sprung into life to battle with and finally
vanquish
these brute oppressors of their country.
Day faded fast. Its last streaks died away in
the West and yet the solemn shape stood there in
its vast, unmoving stillness. And still the people
retained their postures of wonder and fear, while
in hushed voices they spoke of the occupant of
the mountain. Gray, cold twilight at length
cast its mantle upon the vision, and they scattered
in anxious parties towards their homes. But
with them they bore the image of the huge
visitant
.
They could not shake it from them.
A general and deep awe had fallen on the
multitude
,
and even when they sought their slumbers
that giant shape passed before their sealed lids in
a thousand forms, assuming as many attitudes of
assault and defence; for from the first, by a
strange instinct, they had looked upon it as their
foe. To watch its movements, for it could be
yet seen, in the clear distinctness of its immense
stature, calm, majestic, silent; to sound the
alarm; if need be to meet it face to face, should
it descend from its pinnacle, the chieftains of the
Mound-builders thought fit to station armed
sentries
at various corners of the streets and
high-ways
of their towns and cities, on the walls of their
fortresses, and as a more commanding position, on
the summit of their mounds and in the square,
stone observatories which crowned a portion of
them.
The relics of the fortresses and observatories
that night manned by the sentinels of that
peculiar
people, still stand and moulder on the soil of
the far west. They are constructed on principles
of military science now lost or inexplicable.(1)
But, whatever the code of tactics on which
they were fashioned, we cannot but admire, in
the midst of our conjectures, their peculiar
symmetry
,
their number and their duration.
Parallel
with the foundations of Rome these walls
went up, far back in the calendar of time, and
time-defying, they seem destined to pass down, as
far from the present into a misty and pregnant
future, as the actual history of a populous and
mighty race. Like the lost decades of Livy,
some passages are wanting to their completeness,
but in what stands we may read the power, the
strength, the decay, and the downfall of our own
American ancients. They were men of war and
those ramparts first built against a human enemy
were now occupied to keep at bay a new and
untried
foe. From time to time, along the line of
guardsmen went the watchword; the sentries of
different posts occasionally whispering to each
other that the apparition was still visible on the
mountain. Not a few, overwearied with their
fears, slumbered.
The middle watch of the night had come.
The air was dark and still. Not a breath nor
voice broke the universal quiet: when, clear and
sharp, there fell upon the ears of the sleeping
populace, a sound like the crash of sudden
thunder. The earth shook as if trodden by
heavy footsteps, and through the air came a noise
like the rushing of some mighty bulk in violence
and haste. Ponderous hoofs trampled the earth
and drew nigh. It was hethe traditionary brute
Behemothand before his irresistible force
fell whatever strove to gainsay his advance.
The whole region trembled as when a vast body
of waters bursts its way and rolls over the earth,
ocean-like, wave shouting to wave, and all
crowding
onward with thunderous tumult. In vain was
the solid breast-work; the piled wall was in vain;
in vain the armed and watchful sentry. Like some
stupendous engine of war, he bore down on them,
rendering human strength a mockery and human
defences worse than useless, for as wall, bastion
and tower fell, they redoubled death and ruin
on their builders. With a speed of which no
common celerity can give us a conception he
swept through the towns and villages, the
tilled
fields and pleasure gardens of the
Mound-builders
desolating
and desolatenone daring
to stand before his feet thus dreadfully advanced.
The trepidation of the day grew an
hundred-fold
;
from the dark, dim light which the stars
forced through the drifting and solid clouds, they
could but guess vaguely at his bulk, yet out of
their fears and the darkness they wrought an
awful image of vastness and strength. Night
banded with the monster, and terror walked in
their train.
The morning dawned, and its light fell
upon the face of an early wakened and fear
stricken people. On every countenance was
graven the clear and visible imprint of terror;
but the expression was by no means that of
ordinary
alarm, such as is engendered by siege, or
battle or death; nor did it stamp the countenance
with the characters of a daily and familiar fear.
A dread which changed the whole aspect, such
as distorts the features and takes from them their
old, household look, was upon all. In the
consternation
and imbecility of the moment
messengers
were speeded forth and hurried to and fro
through the many villages of the Mound-builders
bearing tidings to which as answer, they received
the same tidings in return! The visitation
had been universal; in each one of their five
thousand villages were left like marks of brute
ravage and strength!(2)
Behemoth had been with them all; and his large
footsteps were traced wide over the plain until
they broke off abruptly at its extreme bounds,
and wheeled heavily into the mountains. When
their dismay had subsided from its first flood-tide,
they began to compare observations and consult
with each other. The memories of most were
bewildered in endeavoring to recall the
occurrences
of the past night; but from what with
their confused faculties, they could grasp, they
were well assured that the whole circuit of
desolation
had been accomplished within the passage
of a single hour. And now the time was come
for them to look forth and measure that
desolation
to
what side shall they first turn?
Everywhere
is some monument of that irresistible
power. In one brief hour he has overthrown
what Time, with his centuries, could not touch.
There at the track of his first foot-prints is a
crushed walldriven through by some powerful,
and to them as yet unknown, weapon of strength,
which has left its dints upon the shattered
fragments
.
Massive portions of it have fallen to
powder beneath his weight. Across the path
which he seems to have chosen out to stalk in
rude triumph, through the very heart of their
dwellings, lies a dead guardsman whom his
might must have first dashed to the earth by
some other unconjectured instrument of power,
and then trampled upon, for at every pore the
blood issues in torrents. Against a dwelling
pinned to its wallis the corpse of a second
sentinel which seems to have been hurled with
scorn by the brute invader into its present
abiding-place
.
On the threshold of her own home
lies a mother with her child closely clinging to
her neck, its little lips pressed to its parent's
both smitten into death by a single blow.
Look forth from this narrow scene and read
the map of a broader ruinthe traces of a more
fearful mastery! Yon mound, consecrated by
the entombed dust of a generation of sages and
heroes is embowelled, and its holy ashes laid
open to the vulgar air and the strumpet wind.
And yon gardens, once the resort of blooming
beauty and gentle childhoodits walls strew the
ground and its flowers, broken and withered, are
sunken by the massy weight which has spoiled
them, deep into the earth. And lo! that trodden
and miry field, shut in by the standing fragments
of two oblong wallsyesterday morn it was a fair
greensward where strength wrestled kindly with
strength and age looked on approvingly. In
another quarter behold a tall tower of stone is
cast down before the same incomprehensible
might! The enclosure which surrounded and
guarded it is battered to the earth, and about it is
collected at this morning hour not a few of the
chiefs of the Mound-builders, deeply lamenting the
overthrow of so scientific and regular a
muniment
.
Sad words pass from each to each and
they look despondingly into each other's faces,
and find no hope, but rather a triumphant
despair. From among the group which hung
thus powerless and complaining over the shattered
battlement boldly stood forth Bokulla, the most
fearless and energetic chieftain of the nation.
Bokulla was a man of singular and prompt
courage
,
of great earnestness of purpose and energy
of character; yet modest and unobtrusive.
In every enterprise he kept himself aloof until
the resources of all his co-laborers were
exhausted
,
and then when all eyes were turned towards
him as the last star of hope, he sprang with
alacrity to the front, prepared to match the
emergency
with some new and vigorous suggestion.
Bokulla was a philosopher no less than a soldier;
not artificially framed by filling his mind with
learned apothegms and pithy instances, but with
a philosophy which was the growth of a
meditative
spirit that looked into all things and gathered
wisdom from most. He possessed, nevertheless,
a thoroughly martial and energetic mind, and
found in every path of life, some accessory
valuable
to strengthen and adorn that character.
Unlike
,
2
however, the majority of professed militants,
he rarely exhibited the gay buoyancy which is
so generally considered in them, an essential. On
the contrary, even in the maddest onset and in the
high flush of triumph his brow was saddened,
ofttimes with a passing cloud of gloom; the
mark which distinguishes too often those who are
born to be the leaders and benefactors of their race.
The mind of Bokulla partook of another
peculiarity
in common with many men of masterly
genius. Whenever defeated or foiled in any
attempt
,
his heart would be plunged for a moment
in the deepest and most torturing despairbut
only for the momentand then reassuming its
lofty strength like an eagle unchained or slipped
from its darkened cage, his soul would spring
into the clear, broad sunshine of its former
condition
.
Such was Bokulla, and when those grouped
around him had each offered his several remark,
and they had mutually mourned over the
present
desolation, he stood forth from their midst
and said, Men! the day is spent with repining,
and the night comes, and with it, perchance, our
dread Enemy. Let us rebuild the wall and show
at least that we can oppose our
old
strength to
his inroads. He has but the instinct of a brute,
we have the reason of men. Let him not, he
cried, let him not find us, for our soul's sake,
let him not find us greater cravens than
yesternight
!
With these words and with the consent of the
chieftains who stood about him, he ordered the
rebuilding of the rampart, and the erection of an
inner one to flank it. Before the passages which
had been previously left free of egress and ingress,
he directed the construction of short and solid
walls which should suffice to arrest access if made
in full front, leaving however side-passages
between
the extremities of the main and those of the
newly erected ramparts. Under the authoritative
and cheering voice of Bokulla, the building-tool
and the trenching-iron ply busily. Parties of
laborers hurry from quarter to quarter of the work,
and something like a manly and worthy spirit
seems again to fire their bosoms and lighten their
toil. While some gather together the broken
portions
of earth and remould them to their purpose,
others bring from the distance new supplies, and
still others quarry and shape the stone to crown
their summits. Under his quick and
commanding
eye the tower of observation goes up and its
defences are restored.
But, while Bokulla and his aids build up the
strong wall to guard the livingis there no duty
and service due to the dead? There is; and
under other guidance the manly forms, which
were laid in the recent encounter, are stretched
for their last repose.
Devoted hands compose their discolored limbs
and bathe them with embalming drugs, while
their kindred, those nearest and dearest in life,
collectto accompany them in this their last
journey, whatever can consecrate or dignify their
sepulture.(3) Those who have fallen fell in the
defence of the nation, and are therefore worthy of
the nation's honors. Let them be buried then as
becomes heroes of the Mound-buildersbearing
away with them into the Unknown Land tokens
of merit and badges of high desert. Their bodies
are swathed in fine raimentat their right hand are
placed the weapons of war, grasping which they
fell; at their sides are arrayed mirrors of glass or
metal (according to their rank) in which they
were wont to look for the reflection of their
own martial features when set for the stern
service
of war. At their heads are disposed the
helms which covered them in the day of battle,
and on their now pulseless breasts lie polished
pieces of copper
in the form of the cross
.(4)
Can it be possible that those antique warriors
were Christian men? That, among them, they
thus cherished trophies of the Crucifixion, and
upheld the ark of that reverend creed? Or at
least some stray fragments of the holy structure
obscurely delivered over to them by paternal or
patriarchal hands? I know not, but this is the
language which their discovered relics speak to
us of the present generation.
Slowly from each dead hero's dwelling winds
forth the solemn procession with its weeping troop
and its religious mourners. Gathering at a central
spot they unite into one body, and thus collected,
take their way towards the funeral mounds.
Attendants
send forth from marble instruments,
shaped like crescents and highly polished, a slow
and mournful music.(5) Beside the bier of each
fallen soldier walks his wife and children, while
at its head marches solemnly the priest who, in
life was his spiritual father.
Winding through the villagesover the
meadows
and
along the stream-side, they reach the
bank right opposite the mounds in which the dead
2*
are to find their final slumber. Descending into
the limpid and shallow stream the bearers gently
dip each corpse beneath the watersthus
purifying
it by a natural sort of baptism from every
earthly grossness, and then they resume their
wayall following with bared ankles through the
placid rivulet. At length they reach the sacred
mound. At its side, toward the East, the earth
is removed, and, turning their faces to the sun,
while the marble breathes forth a higher strain,
the bearers of the dead enter the hollowed mound.
As they enter, the throng chant together a
simple ballad, reciting the virtues and the valor of
the departed, and, at its close recommending them
to the Giver of life and the God of the seasons.
The bier bearers place the mortal remains of the
heroes whom they have borne within the cavity,
upon the earth with their faces upwards, their
feet pointing to the North-east (perhaps the home
of their progenitors) and their heads toward the
more genial South-west.
Thus were the common soldiers, among those
who had fallen buried: but one of that number
he who had been captain of the guard, and a man
of note among the people, received separate and
more especial rites.
His remains were borne apart to a distinct
mound and therewhen they were laid out with
the honors of a chief who had lost his life in
battle
,
martial music breathing from the
instruments
,
and the whole multitude joining in a
chaunt commemorative (like those recited over
the common soldier) of his valor and character
they proceeded to burn his body and gather his
ashes into their separate tomb. They then closed
the mouths of all the mounds, and when the
priests had offered a prayer for the peaceful repose
of their dust, the multitude turned toward their
homes.
All was hushed and silent save the gentle tread
of the homeward tending people. The mourning
relatives of the dead had lulled into a temporary
calm their troublous feelings, and wept with
composure
.
The spirit of peace was over all.
Suddenly
a shrill voice was heard to cry,
He comes!
He comes!
It proceeded from a child, who,
unobserved, had climbed to the upper window of
one of the stone observatories. The multitude
were arrested by the voice, and turning to the
quarter from which it issued, saw the finger of the
alarmist pointing to a body of woods which lay
a short distance West from the path which they
were taking to their homes. As at the bidding of
a god the whole multitude with one accord
swerved round and gazed toward the forest, and
there they beheldBehemoth. Fixed in an
attitude
of astonishment and dread, they stood gazing
and still gazing upon the spectaclea boundless
and motionless gallery of faces. It was near the
sunset. Overhead in its level light, a gray bald
eagle, just flown from its neighboring eyrie, hung
poised in wonder, as if turned to stone by the
novel sight of so vast a creature. In its
motionless
suspension it seemed as if sculptured from the
air while its wings were gilded, like some remains
of the old statuaries, by the golden touch of the
sun.
Visible above the woods, moving heavily
through the sea of green leaves, like leviathan in
the deep, appeared the dark and prodigious form
of the Mastodon: an awful ridge rolling like a
billow, along the tops of the pine and cedar which
grew beneath him. The boundless bulk moved
through the trembling verdure, like an island
which, in some convulsion of nature, shifts
itself along the surface of the sea. The forest
shook as he advanced, while its scared and
barbarous
denizens, the prairie wolf, the gopher and
the panther, skulked silently away.
As yet his whole mighty frame was not visible.
Even amid the trepidation and fear of the
Mound-builders
a curiosity sprang up to behold the sum
of his vast proportions: to see at once before
them and near at hand the actual dimensions of
that shape whose shadowy outlines had, when
first seen, wrought in them effects so boundless
and disastrous.
Occasionally as the Mastodon glided along, a
green tree-top wavered for a moment in the wind,
leaned forward into the airand fell to the earth
as if pushed from its hold by the chance-exerted
strength of the great brute. Again, they heard a
crash, and a giant oak which had just now lorded
it over its fellows was snapped from its stem and
cast far forth over the tops of the forest. His
very breath stirred the leaves till they trembled,
and every step of his march denoted, by some
natural appearance, the possession of monstrous
and fearful power.
After stalking through a large tract of
woodland
without allowing any greater portion of his
bulk to become apparent, he wheeled through the
forest and descending into a wooded valley
disappeared
,
each step reverberating along the earth
with a deep and hollow sound. It was a long
time ere the Mound-builders resumed their old,
homeward progress, and when they did it was
with alarmed and cheerless spirits. The awe of
the great shadow was upon them. Now more than
ever they felt the folly of gainsaying or attempting
to withstand a Power which shrouded itself in a
form so vast and inaccessible.
From that day forth a gloom settled upon the
minds of the Mound-buildersdeep, rayless and
full of fearful omens; for though personal energy
may rescue individuals from that desperate
condition
,
it is a hopeless and a dreadful thing when
nations
become the victims of despair. All the
mighty wheels of life are stopped; all the channels
through which the soul of the people once coursed
are now closed, and, in most cases, closed for ever.
The arteries through which the life-blood once
gushed are deadened, and the warm current is
arrested
as if the winter had descended upon it in its
very spring-tide. The Mound-builders were now
fallen into that sad estate. Neither the
spirit-stirring
voice of Bokulla; nor the trump of war; nor
the memory of their fathers' fields of their fathers'
valor, could awaken them to a sense of what was
due to their manhood or their duty. The
Mastodon
seemed resolved to preserve the spell by an
almost perpetual presence. Day after day in the
same gray twilight did Behemoth cast his shadow
from the summit of some near elevation; and
midnight after midnight, at the same cold and
sullen hour, did he descend and force his huge
bulk through the villages of the Mound-builders:
breaking their walls in pieces, rending their
dwellings, disclosing their mounds and despoiling
their pleasure gardens from end to end. He had
become the spectral visitant of the nation;the
monstrous and inexorable tyrant who, apparently
gliding from the land of shadows, presented
himself
eternally to them, the destroyer of their race.
He seemed, in these terrible incursions, to be fired
with a mighty revenge for some unforgiven
injury
inflicted on his dead and extinct tribe by the
human family. In the calm and solemn quiet of
night, when fretted labor sought repose and
anxious thought craved slumber, he burst down
from the mountains like thunder and bade them
Sleep no more!
The internal and external influence of an
harassment
like this could not be otherwise than
large and disastrous, First came the dire change
in the mind itself: when this terrible shadow
glided among its quiet emotions, its familiar habits,
and its household and national thoughts. All
objects that had hitherto occupied a place in the
mind of the people now assumed a new color
and complexion as this portent fell upon them,
in the same manner as every thing in nature
catches a portion of the gloom of twilight when it
suddenly approaches. No angle of the wide
realm of the Mound-builders escaped from the
darkness of fear, and every where the fountains of
social life became stagnant and ceased to issue in
healthy currents, like streams that are silent and
still when light has departed from their surface.
The voice of joy died away into a timid and
feeble smiling; proud and stately ambition fell
humbled to the earth, and love and beauty
trembled and fled before the gloomy
shadow
of the general adversary. Men shunned
each other as if from a consciousness of their
abasement, and skulked away from the face of
day, unwilling that the heavens should look in
upon their desolation and shame.
Some abandoned their homes and took refuge
in cliffs and inaccessible precipices; preferring
poverty and exposure to wind and tempest and
hostile weather, rather than encounter with a foe
so dreadful and triumphant. The great mass
however lingered in their customary dwellings:
but so thoroughly was every motive to action
numbed and paralyzed, they neglected to
repair
the roof that had fallen, the beam that had
decayed, or the foundation that had yielded to
the summer's rain, and innumerable buildings
throughout the whole realm tumbled into ruin,
and many that stood on the borders of rivers,
undermined by the motion of their currents, tottered
and fell into the stream, while their terror-stricken
inmates, in many cases, perished without a
struggle.
The ordinary occupations and duties of life
were performed with feeble hands and vague
thoughts, or entirely deserted.
This mighty and puissant nation, whose
strength was that of a giant and whose glory
rivalled the sun, was stricken by terror into a
feeble and child-like old age. All its proportions
were diminished; its heart was shrunk, and it
dragged on a slothful and decrepid existence amid
the cold and monumental ruins of what had once
been its beautiful domain and its house of honor
and joy. That salient and almost motiveless
3
energy which drives a nation on through toils,
battles and discomfitures, to prosperity and
triumph
:
that hazardous and all venturous daring
which pushes doubt aside, and which, while it
questions nothing strives at every thing, was
utterly departed.
From the silence and quiet of his studied
retirement
,
Bokulla beheld the shadow as it slowly and
fearfully crossed the national mind; from the first
he saw the change which was coming over it, and
knew that human wisdom was too weak to arrest
or avert it, unless the great first cause could be
removed. And yet, while others yielded thus
submissively to a meek despair, he, keeping
himself
invisible to the general eye, tasked his bold
and liberal mind for some remedy for the evil.
In the calm and dead quiet of his private
chamber
he sat from day to day brooding over plans
and enterprises whereby to rescue the nation.
Bokulla entertained a deep founded confidence
in the human character. Himself equipped with
an indomitable will and faculties stout and
resolute
as iron, he was assured that by similar
qualities
the nation was to be redeemed from thraldom.
Amidst a thousand changes of nature man had
endured: mountains had been cleft asunder;
seas had leaped upon continents and marched
triumphantly over every barrier and obstacle;
great orbs had been extinguished, like tapers of an
evening, in the skies; yet man stood
steadfast
amid the shock and the mutation. Along
the bleak coasts of inhospitable time he had
voyaged in a secure and upright vessel; on this
ridge of earth he still stood while the visible
universe
passed through changes of season, through
increase or diminution of splendors, and through
worlds created or worlds destroyed.
Was man, who thus out-lasted seas, and stars,
and mountains, to be crushed at last by mere
brutal
enginery and corporal strength?
Reflections like these wrought the mind of
Bokulla to a condition of fearless and manly
daring, and he brought his whole soul to the labor
of discovering or contriving the means of triumph
or resistance. It may well be supposed that tower
as his thought might, it strove in vain to
over-top
the stature or master the bulk of the
Mastodon
:
what were fosses, and bastions and
battlements
to him that moved like a mountain against
opposition. No wall could shut him out: seas
might interpose in vain to cut off his fearful
pursuit of a fugitive people. Resting or in
motion
that terrible and far-reaching strength would
overtake them and accomplish its purposes of
desolation
and ruin.
With this stupendous and inevitable image the
whole might of Bokulla's soul wrestled for a long
time. An untiring invention that kept steadily
on the wing started suggestion on suggestion,
but all unequal to the mighty necessity of the
occasion. He gathered facts on which to build
the fabric of opposition huge enough to
counter-vail
a superhuman force, but they tottered and
fell to the earth before the ideal presence of
Behemoth
.
He surveyed mountains and in
imagination
linked them together with wide arches and
empyreal bridges; and compassed the people
round about with rock built circumvallations and
ramparts of insurmountable altitude and strength.
But it would have required ages to complete
the defences suggested by a swift imagination
which would have been equal to their object;
and others which great labor might have more
readily erected, would have been swept away in a
single night by the barbaric invader.
When this conclusion forced itself upon him,
Bokulla felt, for a moment, the pangs of a
hopeless
and overwhelming despair. A midnight
darkness came over his mind, and it was for a time
as if the sun and the heavens were obliterated
from his view, and as if he were doomed to travel
henceforth a gloomy turnpike where all was
sorrow
,
and wailing, and terror without end. But
the light gradually broke in upon his soul, and his
palsied faculties began to awaken and cast off
the slumber and the delusion. His reflections, it
is true, had taught him that his countrymen
could act in defence against their vast oppressor
with but frail chance of success. He was
satisfied
that a weight and bulk as monstrous as that
of Behemoth would burst their way by their mere
impetuous motion through any barrier or redoubt
they might erect. There was another thought,
however, worthy of all considerationcould not
the Mound-builders, a naturally adventurous and
valiant people, act on the offensive?
Abandoning
passive and barbarous suffering, was not
battle
to be waged and waged with hope against the
despoiler? This question Bokulla had put
anxiously to himself, and he watched with
an eager eye for some favorable phase of the
national
feeling ere he addressed it to the country.
From one crisis of fear to another the
Mound-builders
passed rapidly, and as the shades of night
3*
thicken one upon the other, each aspect of their
condition was gloomier than the former. At
length as darkness deepened and strengthened
itself, light began to dawn in the opposite
quarter
.
Hardened by custom, and familiar in a
measure with the object of their dread, they now
ventured to lift their pale, white countenances
and gaze with some steadiness of vision upon the
foe.
Naturally of a noble character and constitution,
the Mound-builders needed only that the original
elements of their temper should be stirred by
some powerful conviction to excite them to
action
.(6)
A new spirit, or rather the ghost of the old
and exiled one, had returned to the nation, and
they now saw before them, unless they resumed
their manhood and generously exerted strength
and council, ages of desolation and fear for
themselves
and their children. Were they men and
should no hazard be dared, no toil nor peril
encountered
to break the massive despotism that
held them to the earth? Were they the
possessors
of a land of sublime and wonderful aspects,
the dwellers amid interminable woods and lakes
of living water, and were no glorious nor resolute
energies matured by these, capable to cope with
that which was mighty and awful?
At this fortunate stage of feeling Bokulla
appeared
.
He clothed the thoughts of the people
in an eloquence of his own. He first painted the
portrait of their past condition in life-like and
startling colors. He told them that from the
apparent
size and solidity of the Mastodon, and the
uniform analogy of nature he might endure for
centuries, yea, even beyond the duration of
mankind
itself, unless his endless desolation could be
arrested. If they suffered now under his irresistible
sway they might suffer for a thousand years to
come. That vast frame, he feared, decay could
not touch. And in a stature so tremendous
must reside an energy and stubbornness of
purpose
,
endurable and unchanging.
Next, addressing them from the summit of a
mound, around which many of the people
were grouped in their old worship (some
faint image of which they had kept up through
all their terror) he appealed to them by the sacred
and inviolate ashes that rested underneath his feet.
If old warriors and generous champions, never
dishonored, could awaken from the slumbers of
death and breathe again the pure air of that
glorious
clime, what voice of denunciation or anger
would they utter!
Are these men, that creep along the earth,
like the pale shadows of autumn, Mound-builders
and children of our loins? What hath
affrighted
them? Look to the mountains, and lo! an
inferior
creature, one of the servants and hirelings
of man, hath the mastery. Arouse! arouse!
our sons! Place in our old, death-withered hands
the swords we once wieldedcrown us with our
familiar helms and we will wage the battle for
you. Victory to the builders of the mounds!
victory to the lords and masters of the earth!
should be our cry of onset and triumph!
The national pulse beat true again, and
Bokulla
hastened from village to village, quickening
and firing it. Every where the hour of
renovation
seemed to have come. Every where
ascending
their high places he appealed to them by
memories
to which they could not but hearken.
Every where an immense populace gathered
about him and listened to his words as if they
were the inspired language of hope. And when
their souls were fired, as it were, under the
fervent
heat of his eloquence, he skilfully moulded
them to his own plan and purpose. He recounted
to them the mode, the time and course he thought
fit for them to adopt in seeking battle with
Behemoth.
After consultation with their chieftains, the
levy expected and demanded of each was soon
settled.
They were to venture forth with an army
(easily collected in that populous nation) of one
hundred thousand strong. Bokulla was to be
the leader-in-chief. Approved men were to be
his counsel and aids. The day of setting forth
on the great campaign was fixed; not far distant.
In the mean time, all diligence and labor were to
be employed in disciplining, equipping, and
inspiriting
the troops: in burnishing and framing
the necessary armor, and in constructing certain
new engines of war, which Bokulla had invented,
and which might be of use in the encounter
with the terrible foe.
Every village now presented a picture of busy
preparation and warlike bustle. The forges,
whose fires had smouldered in long disuse, were
again rekindled, and their anvils rang with the
noise of a thousand hammers rivalling each other
in the skill with which they moulded the metals
into heroic shapes. While one wrought out with
ready dexterity the breast-plate, with its large,
circular bosses of silver, another, with equal, but
less costly felicity, framed the brazen hatchet, and
the steel arrow-head. In every workshop there
were employed artizans in sufficient number to
not only begin with the rude ore and shape it into
form, but also to carry it through every stage of
labortipping it with silverburnishing
ornamenting
completing
them,affixing leathern
handles to the bosses by which to grasp and
hold the shield, and arranging them in due order
for inspection by the appointed officers.(7)
An another and higher class of laboratories they
were employed in framing and fashioning
weapons
for chieftains and warriors of note; swords
of tempered steel and scabbards of silver, capped
with points of other and less penetrable material:
and helmets of copper and shields, with
ornamental
and heraldic devices. Some busied
themselves in furnishing large shields of brass,
which they polished with care until they glittered
againwhile still farther on, they wrought out
large bows of steel, from which to speed the
barbed arrows prepared by their fellow-workmen.
Farther up, near the mountain-side, there lay a
range of shops in which a thousand operatives
constructed military wagons and other vehicles
for the expedition; for they knew not how far it
might extend, nor through what variety of hill
and dale.
To the right of these were gathered artizans
under the immediate superintendence of the
commander-in-chief, who labored at certain vast
and new engines of battle, more especially
contrived
for conflict with the vast Brute. These
were large and ponderous wooden structures,
something like the towers used in Roman
war-fare
,
but, as the strength and stature of the foe
required, of far greater height and stiffness.
They were to be planted on heavy wheels and
of great circumferenceplaced far apart, so as to
furnish for the whole edifice a broad and
immoveable
base. On the outer side, they were armed
with every sort of sharp-edged weapon, cutlass,
falchion, and spearhead, so as to be, if possible,
unassailable by Behemoth. Internally, they were
furnished with great store of vast bows and
poisoned
shafts, with which, if such thing might be, to
pierce him in some vulnerable point, or at least to
gall him sorely and drive him at a distance.
Besides
these there were suspended, in copious
abundance
,
divers ingenious implements, each
contrived
for some emergency of battle, to strike, to
ward, to wound, and to destroy.
Others were building, taller and stronger, at
the summits of which were suspended great
masses
of metal and ponderous hammers, tons in
weight, with which to wage a dreadful battery
against the mightyfoe. By some internal
machinery
,
it was so contrived that these solid weights
of metal could be swung to and fro with fearful
swiftness and violence, by the application of a
small and apparently inadequate power. Another
structure, like these, was prepared, from which to
cast, by means of capacious instruments, large
quantities of molten metals, kept in fusion by
mighty furnaces, to be hurled upon the enemy
from afar, and to descend upon him in
sulphurous
and deadly showers, like those which fell on
Sodom and Gomorrah of old.
Day and night, night even to its middle watches,
were devoted to the construction and fabrication
of engines and implements like these: for their
minds were now so anchored on this great
enterprise
,
that all other ties were cast loose, and in
this alone they embarked every thought and
purpose
.
The hours hitherto given to repose and
sleep, were now made vassals to the new
adventure
.
It was a magnificent spectacle to see a whole
nation thus gathered under the dark wing of the
midnight, working out battle for their dread
adversary
.
Athwart the solid darkness which
pressed upon their dwellings, the gleams of
swarthy
labor shot long and frequent. Far through
the hills echoed the clangor of armorers, and
the sharp sounds of multitudinous toil,
laboring
,
each in its kind, toward the redemption of a
people.
Grouped thus about their forges, and hurrying
from one task to another with rapid and quiet
tread, they might have seemed to the eye of
imagination, looking down from the
neighboring
heights, to be employed in infernal labor,
and vexing the noon of night with unearthly and
Satanic cares.
But over the wide scene there rested a blessing,
for the smile of Heaven always shines upon the
oppressed who nobly yearn and vigorously strive
to break their chains. The long and bright
hours of day, too, were crowded with their
peculiar
duties. The gardens and the enclosed plains,
again restored to their old symmetry and beauty,
4
were now filled with a soldiery which, under the
eye of dexterous leaders, were drilled, deployed,
marshalled, and schooled into new manuvres,
before this unknown in the wars of the
Mound-builders
,
and adapted to the character of their
unwonted antagonist. They were taught to
wheel with novel evolutions, to retreat in less
orderly but more evasive movements and marches
than of old, and to attack with a wariness and
caution hitherto unpractised in their encounters
with mortal enemies. Over all the eye of
Bokulla
glanced, giving system to the orders of the
chieftains, and confidence to the obedience of
their legions. Apparently performing duty
nowhere
,
he fulfilled it every where, with a calm
and masterly skill, which, while it was unobserved
by the careless, was an object of admiration to
the higher order of men, who were made the
immediate channels of his influence, and who
were therefore brought more directly under the
spell.
Upon my soul, cried the taller of two
officers
,
who stood near the trunk of a withered
cedar, which overshadowed a wide and deep
sunken
well, looking upon one of these novel parades,
upon my soul, Bokulla hath the power and the
knowledge of a God. Out of these men, but
yesterday dumb and torpid with fear, he has
struck the spirit of life, and that with the same
ease as my sword-blade strikes from this dull
stone at my foot, sparks of fire.
Who can withstand those giant machines
which tower yonder, like mountains, above our
dwellings? cried his companion. The Spirit
of Evil himself, if embodied in the frame of the
Brute, must fall before those whirlwind hammers
of brass and tempests of molten copper!
While he spoke, one of the vast oaken
structures
had been wheeled out, and its ponderous
enginery set in motion, and brought to bear upon
a crag that projected from the mountain near
which it rested. To and fro they swung with
fearful force and velocity, at each blow shattering
vast masses from the rock, and bringing them
headlong down the mountain. At the same time,
not far distant, tons of crude ore were cast into
the furnaces, affixed to the other towers, and
hurled
forth upon the prairie in clouds of fire, which,
as they fell upon the earth, scathed and withered
every thing before them.
Although the multitude entertained hearts of
favor and hope towards the project of meeting
Behemoth in battle, there were a few who
doubted
its wisdom and foreboded a gloomy result.
The dinging of those anvils, said an aged
man who sat at the sunset in the front of his
dwelling, to his spouse (no less stricken in years),
who leaned out at the window, the dinging of
yon anvils is to my ears a mere death-dirge.
Wherefore are the youth of our land to be led
forth on this vain pilgrimage? They are
fore-doomed
by the hooting of the owl, which has
been ceaseless in our woods since first it was
planned. The dismal bat and the brown vulture
flap their wings over our bright day-marshallings
in expectancy of a banquet.
And as for the chieftain, Bokulla, continued
his wife, prolonging the dolorous strain of
conversation
,
his defeat, if not death, is already doomed
in Heaven. The star which fell but yesternight
luridly athwart his dwelling, foretold that sequel
too well. And his spouse, stumbled she not
essaying
but this morning to cross its threshold and
greet the home-return of Bokulla from the distant
villages?
This army, five score thousand in numbers,
reiterated the old man, will be but as the snow in
the whirlwind before the breath of Behemoth
They have forgotten, senseless men! the story of
our fathers. They recollect not how in ancient
days the fellow of this vast Brute (perchance ethis
living one himself) was met by our hunters in the
mountain gorge: that his roar was like thunder
near at hand, and his tread like the invasion of
waters! that they shrunk before him into the
hollows of the rocks as the white cloud scatters
before the sun!(8)
I pray Heaven the wife of Bokulla be not
widowed
,
echoed his spouse. The chieftain is a
bold man, and submits but poorly to the lording
of any, be it man or brute.
I fear this spirit pricks him on too far in
this emprise; I have warned him secretly,
concluded the old mound-builder, in a deep and
solemn tone of voice; I have warned him, but
he scorns my warning. He will not be stayed in
his purpose. I will warn him yet once more, for
he dreams not that he goes out to war with one
who is a giant in instinct as well as in strength!
The eventful morning of going forth against the
Mastodon came: it was a morning bright with
beautiful auspices. The sky overhead glittered with
its fresh and airy splendors: no cloud dimmed the
world of indescribable blue which hung calm and
4*
motionless like heaven itself on high.
Occasionally
against its clear canvass a passing troop of
wild-fowl painted their forms, and vanished; or,
a tree-top here and there stood out, pencilled upon
it, with its branches and foliage all distinct. The
sun rode just over the horizon, and through the
innumerable villages of the Mound-builders the
martial trumpet sounded the spirit-stirring alarum.
At the call, one hundred thousand right-good
men of battle seized their arms and marched
through the territory of their brethren in solid
array.
First at the head of the van, drawn in a
two-wheeled
chariot of wood, studded with iron and
ornamented with an eagle at each of its four points,
front and rear, and drawn by a single powerful
and jet-black bison, came Bokulla himself. He
stood erect in the vehicle, while his burnished
armor
and towering helm flung their splendor far
and wide; in his hand he held no rein but guided
the noble beast by his mere intonations of voice.
Behind Bokulla followed a company of
men-at-arms
,
each bearing a long and stalwart club,
armed at its heavier extremity with a four-edged
sword or falchion, to the point of which was
affixed
a spear-like weapon stiff and keen. Of these
there were one hundred, each cased in a mail of
elk-skin, which, while it was flexible and yielded
to every gesture of the body, was yet a sufficient
defence against any ordinary assault. These
were expected, beside guarding and sustaining
Bokulla, to close with Behemoth, and taking
advantage
of the unwieldy motion of his frame, to
wound his legs or otherwise annoy and disable
him. Behind these followed an equal phalanx of
spear-men, whose allotted duty it was with a
longer
weapon to probe the Brute at a distance, and
draw his attention from any quarter to which it
might appear directed with too much vigor and
chance of danger. In the rear of the company of
spear-men marched a strong body of common
soldiers
,
bearing the customary Mound-builders'
instruments
of war, namely, vast steel bows six feet
or more in length, and quivers filled with
correspondent
shafts tipped with poisons, and on their
left arms bearing the usual shield of copper with
bosses of silver. In the rear of these heavily
rolled on two of those newly-invented machines,
which rose like pyramids above the array. These
were drawn by scores of yoked bisons, and
driven
forward by private soldiers who walked at
their sides. The earth shook under their
lumbering
weight. Their bowels were filled with
captains and privates who had charge, each in
his station, of their implements of death.
Following
these, in order, marched a numerous
squadron
,
sustaining over their sinewy shoulders heavy
axes of steel with edges sharp as death, and
handles
of immoveable oak. Drawn by a thousand
beasts of burthen, behind these, came
innumerable
provision and baggage wagons, provided for
the emergency of a protracted search for the
enemy
,
and long delay in vanquishing and
destroying
him. These were accompanied with troops
and officers. Behind these walked countless
varieties
of battle: soldiers, the very conception of
whose armor and weapons is lost in the oblivious
and mouldering past. Rearmost came six other
towers bearing their immense hammers and fiery
furnaces, with ten thousand troops to guard, to
guide them; to select even roads for their
progress
,
and last to wield their vast forces in the
hour of conflict.
Over the whole floated a hundred bright and
emblematic pennons, while the sonorous metal kept
time to their waving folds as the morning wind
dallied them to and fro. It was a glorious thing
to see ten times ten thousand thus equipped and
embattled going forth on that gay morning, to
the war.
Wherever their course lay it was thronged
with the multitude pushing to gain a sight of
Bokulla and his compeers, the solid soldiery and
the stupendous structures. Every window was
filled, every elevation seized on, every housetop
covered by spectators straining their vision to
gather
in every appointment and device, banner and
sword, bison, chieftain and all. Ah! well might
their eyes ache to look upon that numerous
chivalry
!
Well might they hang with lingering
gaze upon the fair cheeks of that youthful array!
Well might their hearts keep time with the
onward
steps of that glorious host! Happy is it
for mortals that they can enjoy the pageant of the
present, and have no power to prefigure in it the
funeral procession and the mournful company
into which the future may change it!
As the foot of the last soldier left the territory
of the Mound-builders, the drums and trumpets
sounded a farewell, and the army, taking the right
bank of a rapid stream which ran due West,
pursued
its march. The ground over which their
course lay was a smooth and pleasant
greensward
,
the verdure of which was still wet with
the dews of the night. Occasionally it rose into
a gentle elevation which, for the first few miles,
brought the advancing army once again in sight
of the expectant gazers who still kept their posts
upon housetop, tower and mound. At length
from one of these eminences they descended into
a valley which bore them altogether from the view
of the most favorably-stationed looker-out. And
yet, even when their banners and tall structures
had passed wholly from the sight, gushes of
music, fainter and fainter at each note, reached
their ears, and reverberated from the neighboring
cliffs and hill-sides.
Onward they passed through the long vale
which stretched before them, choosing out the
clearest paths, and still keeping their march toward
the occident. In selecting this route they were
guided by large tracks which appeared at remote
strides in the earth, and by frequent signs of
devastation
fallen
trees and crushed underwood.
Once they came to a river of great width,
on the near margin of which, at the water's
edge, appeared two large foot-prints, while on
the opposite bank were discovered indentations
equally vast but impressed deeper in the soil,
as if the monstrous Beast had reared on his
hindermost feet and with supernatural strength
and agility thrown himself across the intervening
breadth of waters. As there were no bridges
near at hand they were forced to compass the
river by a circuitous route to regain the tracks
which had been espied on the other bank.
After attaining the utter extremity of the vale,
through which the stream in question poured its
tide, they pursued their chosen way into a thick
wood, the path of the Mastodon through which
seemed to have been created by sweeping before
him, with a flexible power, whatever obstructed
his progress. On every side of the huge gap
into which the army now entered, lay prostrate
trees of greatest magnitude; oak, pine and
sycamore. Some, apparently, had been cast on
high, and, descending into the neighboring
forest
,
left their roots naked in the air, unnaturally
inverted and exposed. And yet, save in the
immediate
path of the Desolator, nature smiled
unalarmed and innocent, in its primeval and
virgin
beauty. Here and there, shone out in the
forest bright green patches, rising often into
gentle
slopes, or softening away into vales as
gentle
.
Frequently the upland was crowned with
groups of small trees, and the vales were
tesselated
with sweet wild-flowers. Then they
crossed babbling brooks and rivulets, which ran
across their march with a melodious murmur,
eloquent with reproaches on the warlike task they
were at present pursuing. Again, a large stream,
which had gathered volume from the neighboring
mountains, came rushing down declivities, and
seemed to shout them on to battle.
At times, in the course of this variegated
march, they fell upon open spaces where, for a
small circuit, no tree was to be seen; rich
meadows
,
the chosen pastures of the wild beings of
the prairies, pranked with red and white clover,
and fragrant as the rose, in their unmown
freshness
.
Sometimes they passed through sudden and
narrow defiles, overhung by frowning cliffs and
clothed with a dank verdure which seemed
to be the growth of a century. One gorge, in
particular, of this kind, they encountered whose
beetling rocks in their dark and regular
grandeur
,
looked as if they might have been wrought
out by the hands of the old Cyclops or
Pelasgians
strange. They seemed to be the solemn
halls of a great race which had its seat of
empire
there (beyond even the age of the
Mound-builders
)
and chambered in its tabernacles of
ever-lasting
stone. But Nature alone built these halls
for herself, and through them toward the West
she walks at the twilight and morning hour in
pomp and majesty. I see her, her skirts purpled
with evening, and flowing forth in the fresh
breezes of that untainted clime, now pacing those
mighty avenues and recalling, in their awful
stillness
,
the nations which slumber at her feet. Her
face brightens like a sun, as she meditates over the
empires which have faded from earth into the dust
beneath her; she thinks and kindles in knowing
and remembering that while man is mortal and
perisheth, she is eternal and thrones with God.
The glittering and long-extended host of the
Mound-builders marched on through this
cliff-walled
passage, and passed next from all glimpse
of the sun into dense and almost impervious
woods; impervious but for the way hewn out by
the mighty Pioneer in whose tracks they
continued
to tread. Gloom, with its midnight wings,
sate on high and brooded over the boundless
thicket.
The very leaves seemed dipped in a deeper
hue of green, and the grass was thick and matted
underneath, as if in that desolate region it clung
5
closer to the earth. Above stood in their ancient
stillness (apparently unbroken for ages) the tall,
sombre trees, while about their trunks venerable
ivies and mosses clung desperately, and mounted
far up toward their topmost branches. Athwart
the solid darkness no wing, save that of a
melancholy
owl or bat, clove and furnished to the
tenebrous
realm the sign of life or motion. On the
earth no living thing was to be seen, unless amid
the dank grass an occasional toad or serpent,
sitting
or coiled on the cold stone. And yet, though
life seemed extinct, or exhibited itself only in
reptile
and hateful forms, the Mound-builders, as they
marched on through the gloomy quiet, in pursuit
of their mighty prey, saw, in the dimly discovered
foot-marks which they still followed, a token of
vast and inexplicable power which deepened the
darkness about them and infused a portion of its
weird influence into their souls. And yet with
purpose unshaken, they advanced. Again the
blessed sunshine greeted them, and the low mist
rolled heavily from their mindsand again their
purpose stood out to their inward eye clear and
determinate.
Emerging from the awful woods they came to
a broad prairie across which the large foot-steps
were deeply visible. On every side, as far as the
eye could reach, the ample plain was desert and
unoccupied. The innumerable herds of bison
which had once been its tenantry had now, before
the terror of Behemoth, fled away, and the
wild wolf, which once lurked amid the rank
grass, skulked from a Power which seemed to
overshadow the earth. Still there was a province
of animated nature into which the alarm scarcely
ascended: for on high, as in the quiet and
fearless
hours of earlier times, the brown vulture and
the bald eagle flew, silently sailing on, or sending
through the air their shrill notes of ecstacy and
rapture. The boundlessness of those mighty
meadows was in itself calculated to strike an awe
through the bosom of the advancing army;
before
it they laythe Map of the Infinite: a vast
table on which, as on the tables of stone the
fingers
of an omnipotent had written Majesty,
Power and Eternity. Contemplations like these
were sufficient in themselves to fill the mind
of the armed host with feelings of awe and
humility
,
but when, over the immense prairie, they
saw evidences that something had passed which
for the moment rivalled Deity; more palpable in
its manifestations, nearer in its visible strength,
and less merciful in its might; when the tracks
about them and the desert solitude which
Behemoth
had created became thus clearly apparent,
they shrunk within themselves and doubted the
wisdom of their present enterprise.
This feeling however reigned but for a moment.
More manly and martial thoughts soon took their
place, and they pressed on in the path pointed out
with alacrity and courage. The verge of the
plain, which they had now reached, bordered on
a long and high ridge of mountains, which
stretched from the margin of the prairie far West.
Upon these summits they now advanced.
Arrayed
in broad and solid columns the army
moved on over the mighty causeway, their
trumpets
filling the air with novel music; while the
echo of their martial steps, sounding through the
wilderness, affrighted Silence from his ancient
throne. Against the clear sky their bright
banners
flaunted, and high up into the heaven
aspired
the warlike tower flashing death from every
point. The gleam of ten thousand swords
streamed from those broad heights far into the
depths of airabove, around, belowlighting
the solitude like a new-risen sun.
The pride of war now truly kindled their
breastsfear skulked aside from their heroic way,
and Death, could he have come forth a personal
being, on those clear summits, as their pulses
freshened in treading them, would have been no
phantom.
Through the ranks a soldierly joy prevailed,
and with the rousing drum their spirits beat high.
They had reached the extreme limit of the
mountain ridge, and were preparing to descend
into the plain which broadened at its foot, when,
afar off, they espied, slowly heaving itself to and
fro in the ocean, which sparkled in the mid-day
sun beyond the plain, a vast body which soon
shaped itself to their vision into the form of
Behemoth.
The army halted and stood gazing. The
giant beast seemed to be sporting with the ocean.
For a moment he plunged into it, and
swimming
out a league with his head and lithe
proboscis
reared above the waters, spouted forth a
sea of bright, blue fluid toward the sky,
ascending
to the very cloud, which, returning, brightened
into innumerable rainbows, large and small, and
spanned the ocean. Again he cast his huge bulk
along the main, and lay floating many a rood
in the soft middle sun, basking in its ray and
5*
presenting in the grandeur and vastness of his
repose, a monumental image of Eternal Quiet.
Bronze nor marble have ever been wrought into
sculpture as grand and sublime as the motionless
shape of that mighty Brute resting on the sea.
Even at the remote distance from which they
viewed him they could catch at times through
the ocean-spray, the sparkle of his small and
burning eye. Once, it seemed for a moment
steadily fixed upon their host as it stood out
conspicuously
on the height, and, abandoning his
gambols, Behemoth urged his bulky frame toward
the land. Breasting the mighty surges which his
own motion created, he sought the shore, and as
he came up majestically from the water, a chasm
ensued as if the Pacific shrunk from its limits.
With a gurgling tumult the subsiding waves
rushed
into the broad hollow, and continued to eddy
about its vortex.
Meantime Behemoth stood upon the earth,
and rearing on his hindmost feet his
foremost
were lifted high in the air, and with a
roar loud and fearful (like the gathering of an
earthquake with its powers of desolation in the
bowels of the earth) he brought them to the plain
with a weight and energy which made it tremble
to its utmost verge. He moved on; making
straight toward the army of the Mound-builders.
To the eyes of the astonished host, as he shouted
with his fearful voice, he seemed like a dread
thunder cloud which gathers tone and volume as
it rolls on assaulting with its hollow peals the very
walls of Heaven. Bokulla was undismayed and
calm. He saw that the hour for action had
arrived
,
and marshalling his troops in proper order,
he led them down a winding and gentle slope
which descended to the plain. A short time
sufficed and they reached the level ground.
Disposing
themselves in the preconcerted order, they
awaited the on-coming of Behemoth. The
towers
were planted firm on the earth; the pioneers
put forth and the instrumental sounds began.
As an additional thought a battalion of troops
was placed on a level ledge of rocks, on the side
of the mountain, and in advance of the main
army, to gall him as he passed.
On his part there was no delay: with strides,
like those of gods, he stalked forward. And still
he seemed, to the Mound-builders, to grow with
his advance. His bulk dilated, until it came
between
them and heaven, and filled the whole
circuit
of the sky. The firmament seemed to rest
upon his wide shoulders as a mantle. As he
neared
upon their view, they saw more of his structure
and properties. His face was like a vast
countenance
cut in stone, hewn from the hard granite
of the mountain-side, with features large as those
of the Egyptian sphinx. Before him he bore
terrible instruments of power! a mighty and
lithe trunk, which, with swift skill, he coiled and
darted through the air, like a monstrous serpent,
instinct with poison and death. Guarding the
trunk were two far extending tusks, which
curved
and flashed in the sun like scimitars. Over
his huger proportions fear cast its shadow, and
they saw them as through a cloud darkly. He
moved forward, nevertheless, a vast machine of
war, containing in himself all the muniments and
defences of a well-appointed host. To the cool and
courageous sagacity of the leader he seemed to join
the strength and force of an embattled soldiery:
to sharp and ready weapons of offence he added
the defence of a huge and impenetrable frame.
Through his small and flaming orbs, his soul
shot forth in flashes dark and desperate. His
neck was ridged with a short and stiff mane,
which lent an additional terror to his bulk.
On he came. He neared the host of the
Mound-builders. His fearful trunk was uplifted,
and his tusks glanced in the broad beam of day
over the heads of the army. Not a sword left its
scabbard. Not an arrow was pointed. The
brazen
hammers and vessels of molten copper, which
had alone been raised, fell back to their places,
powerless and ineffective. The palsy of fear was
upon the whole host. The near and unexpected
vastness of Behemoth awed their souls. Bokulla
alone retained his self-possession, and shouted to
the affrighted squadrons: Onward!
Mound-builders
cheer
up, and onward! the battle may
yet be with us! It was in vain. The vast
proboscis
descended, and crushed with its descent a
whole phalanx. A second sweep, and the mighty
wooden towers, with their hammers of brass,
their molten copper, and their indwelling
defenders
,
were hurled on high, and rushing to the
earth, strewed the plain with their wreck.
Ten thousand perished under his feet as he
trampled onward. Ten thousand fell stricken to
the earth by the mere icy bolt of fear. The
legion, stationed on the level ledge, were swept
from their post, as the whirlwind sweeps the
dust from the autumn leaf. Twice ten thousand
and more fled up the mountain; across the
prairies
;
and some, in their extreme of trepidation,
sought shelter in the sea. With infinite ruin the
main host lay scattered upon the prairie, shield,
sword, bow, wagon, wagoner, spearsman, and
pioneer. Over the plain, maddened by terror, the
bisons, with their vehicles, following in clattering
haste, galloped, they knew not whither. Of a
body of about fifteen thousand men, Bokulla,
collected
as ever, took command, and marshalling
them through a narrow defile, led them up the
mountain, from which the whole army had a few
hours before descended in pomp and glory.
Guiding
them along the ridge by new and well chosen
paths, he hurried them forward. In the mean
time Behemoth had perfected his work upon the
squadrons which were left. When the task of
death and ruin was completed, he stood in the
middle of the wreck, and, gazing about, seemed
to seek for some portion of the host on whom
desolation was yet to be wrought. With
sagacious
instinct he soon discovered the path
which the missing legions had taken. Instantly
abandoning the plain, he pressed toward the
gap through which the retreating troops had
fled.
Rushing through the defile, he was soon
standing
on the steps of Bokulla and his flying troops.
Through each narrow pass of rocks the
chieftain
skilfully guided them, taking advantage of
every object that might be an obstacle to the
monstrous
frame of their pursuer. Sometimes they
mounted a sudden ascent, sometimes hastened
through a narrow vale, or around a clump of
mighty sycamores and cotton-woods.
Nevertheless
Behemoth pressed on. Behind them, terrible
as the voice of death, they heard his resounding
roar, and turned pale with affright. They had
reached the crown of a hill, and were compassing
a tall rock, which stood in their way, to descend,
when they heard heavy, trampling steps behind
them, and looking back, they beheld the
ponderous
bulk of the Mastodon urging rapidly up the
ascent. Trepidation fastened on the ranks.
Their knees smote together, and many, in the
weakness of sudden fear, fell quaking to the
earth. Some, in their alarm, cast themselves
headlong from the height; some escaped into the
neighboring woods, and two or three, bereft of
sense by terror, fled into the very jaws of the
huge beast himself. A small band only kept on
their way with Bokulla.
Surging up the steep, and down the
opposite
descent, Behemoth pushed forward,
trampling
to the earth those who stood rooted in
his pathstatues of despairand was soon at
the rear of the small flying troop.
He was at the very heels of the pale fugitives;
and Bokulla, placing a trumpet at his lips, blew
a long, loud, and what, in the hour of battle
and under other auspices, would have been an
inspiriting blast, and endeavored to arouse in them
sufficient spirit and strength to bear them to the
shelter of a gigantic crag which stood in their
path. Past this the velocity and impetus of the
brute would inevitably force him, and they might
rest for a moment while he rushed down and
reascended
(if re-ascend he should) the declivity.
The attempt was successless: the trumpet-blast,
vainly blown, was borne far away into the
forests
,
and, echoing from cliff to cliff, seemed only
to awaken the idle air.
From Bokulla, one by one, his followers
fell off, and perished by Behemoth, or crept
into the grass and underwood to die a
more lingering death. At length the
chieftain
was alone before his mighty pursuer. And
yet he bated not a jot of heart or hope, but
still bore up and steered right onward. With
the emergency his courage, resolution, and
fore-thought
rose.
He kept his way steadily, and the bison which
drew him nobly seconded his purpose, and
exhibited
,
as if inspired by the greatness of the
occasion, the power of reason in comprehending,
and a giant's strength in carrying out, the most
expedient means for the rescue of his master's
person. He seemed to apprehend every direction
of Bokulla's at a thought. To the right
between
yon stout oaks! To the leftonward
Bokulla is at your mercy! shouted the rider,
and they swept along like the prophet and his
chariot of fire.The night had gradually come
on. Palpable twilight now overspread the scene,
and, in a moment, the moon glided to her
station
in the zenith.
The woods through which Bokulla passed
were now filled with shadows, which crossing
and blending with each other, would have
confused
mere human skill in selecting a path; but
the bison dexterously steered on. With
cumbrous
but swift steps Behemoth still pursued,
over hills, vales, mountains.
At length Bokulla reached that very summit
where first the gigantic Phantom had appeared
6
and where the impress of his steps was yet
clearly
left. He had just commenced his descent
toward
the villages of the Mound-builders, (
thousands
of whom looked toward his chariot as he
sounded another peal on his trumpet) and
Behemoth
stood behind him. The mighty brute,
from some unconjecturable motive, paused. He
saw the chariot of Bokulla rapidly verging
toward
its home. He abandoned the pursuit, but yet
yielded not his purpose of destroying the last of
the army of the Mound-builders; for, loosening
from its base a massy rock, which hung
threatening
over the village, he lifted it with his tusks
and pushing it forward, urged it with tremendous
force directly in the career of the chieftain.
Thundering
it followed him. It neared his chariot.
Another turn and Bokulla is crushed: but the
Mound-builders shout in one voice To the right,
Bokulla! to the right! and turning his chariot
in that direction, he escapes the descending ruin,
though enveloped in the dust of its track.
Emerging quickly from the cloud, and avoiding
the rocky mass, which rushed past him with
terrible fury, Bokulla now reached the bottom of
the mountain, and was surrounded instantly by
innumerable Mound-builders, each with a fearful
question on his lips, and the dread of a yet more
fearful answer written in his countenance.
Bokulla
,
alone and in flight, was a reply to all their
thoughts could imagine or dread of what was
terrible. Gazing upon him for a while in
motionless
silence, they at length burst the stupor
which made them dumb, and each one asked for
husband, brother, son,who had gone forth but
a few days since, full of life and vigor, against
Behemoth. Deathdefeatand flight! were
all that escaped from Bokulla, and, breaking his
way through the multitude, he sought his own
home. Gathering about the house of the
chieftain
,
men, women and children, in large crowds,
they cried out through the live-long night, while
their tears fell for their relatives who had
ventured
to the battle, and asked wherefore they came
not back?
The next day, about noon, there rushed into
the village, covered with foam and quaking with
fear, troops of bison, followed by the
frame-work
on which the towers and machines of war
had been raised, and clattering through the
streets with their enormous and lumbering wheels
till they reached their stallsthey fell dead. To
some of them a handful of men clung tenaciously,
though pale and terror-stricken, and to the rear
of one hung by his feet, which were entangled
in the leathern strap that had bound the frame
together, a lifeless body, the skull of which was
broken by rude and hasty contact with the earth,
while the tufts of hair which remained, were
matted with grass, thorns and mire, gathered as
it was drawn swiftly along through the different
varieties of verdure, marsh, and brambles.
The next day after that, at about night-fall,
there came down the mountains which Bokulla
had descended under circumstances of so much
peril, a lean and tattered company, marshalled
forward by the ghost-like figure of a chieftain,
with a broken helm, husky voice, and swordless
scabbard. They were a portion of the army
which had gone forth with Bokulla, and had been
reduced to their present pale and ragged
condition
partly by fear and partly by the want of food
for the two days during which they had
wandered
in search of home. Many a wife and mother
shed tears of mingled gratitude and pity as she
looked upon the shattered wreck of her son or
husband, thus cast up from the waves of war.
Two or three days after this, and day by day, for
some week or two, came into the villages of the
Mound-builders, single fugitives, or in pairs, when
they had coupled themselves together, that in
this sorrowful fellowship, they might aid each
other in bearing up against terror, hunger and
death.
And even after a month had rolled round, and
tears had been shed and rites performed for the
absentees, two or three strayed home lunatic;
poor idiots, whose brains had been crazed by the
triple assault of fear, famine, and the dread of
instant
death under the hoofs of the enemy. From
the account that could be gathered from their
own wandering and confused wits, they had fled
every inch of the way from the battle-ground
under the terrible apprehension that Behemoth
was at their heels. Through brake and through
briar they had hastened; they had scrambled
over rocks and waded wide ponds: they had
climbed trees and rested a little, and then swinging
themselves from the branches, had run miles over
hot and streamless prairies, until they had reached
their native villages, sad, witless idiots!
The catastrophe now stood out before the
Mound-builders, drawn in bold, strong and
fearful
strokes; painted in colors borrowed from the
midnight, and dashed upon the canvass (it almost
6*
seemed) by the hand of destiny itself. The
malignant
planet which had so long lowered in the
atmosphere, had now burst, and poured from its
womb all that was dreadful, pernicious and
enduring
.
The earth was now to them a cold,
comfortless prison, into which they were plunged
by an inexorable power, and where they were
doomed to drag through their allotted portion of
life, under the eye of an eternal and terrible foe;
joyless, hopeless and prostrate. The multitude
gave themselves to a quiet and passionless despair.
Bokulla was silent or invisible.
Great occasions beget great men, but what is
singular and rarely noted, they have also a
tendency
to nurse into life a swarm of petty spirits,
which take the opportunity, uninvited, to push
themselves into prominent posts. Thus the same
emergency which elicited the resources of
Bokulla's
large and fruitful mind, also drew out the
vagaries and absurdities of a puny intellect,
Kluckhatch by name. On account of his
dwarfish
size and an unlucky curvature in the legs,
this valorous gentleman had been rejected from
the military companies. Nevertheless he kept a
drum on his own account, with which he was
wont to regale a rabble crowd of urchins and
maidens; making a monthly tour through the
villages and refreshing them with the dulcet
sounds. He also wore in this itinerant and
volunteer
soldiery of his a small sword; a bright
pyramidal blade of steel with a handle of elk's
horn, the tip of which was surmounted with a
clasp or circlet of silver and ornamented with
the device of an owl hooting. The person of
Kluckhatch was, as I have hinted, pigmean rather
than otherwise. He had a low forehead with
prominent cheek bones, and a broad full-moon
face with large eyes, in which idiocy and
self-conceit
predominated, though they were
occasionally
enlivened with an expression of mirth and
good-fellowship, and sometimes even brightened
with a humorous conception. On the crown of
his head, to complete his garniture, Kluckhatch
bore a cap of conical figure, with a flattened
circular
summit, ending at the apex with a round
button of copper. Attached to the sides of the cap
were two large ear-flaps of deer-skin, or that of
some other indigenous animal, made to cover
ears as large.
I believe, said this self-constituted champion,
when every plan suggested and acted upon had
proved fruitless, I believe, said he,
I
must
take this huge blusterer in hand. I look for a
mound of the largest size at least for my memory
if I lay him at length, and a patent of nobility for
my family. Kluckhatch is no foolis he?
asked the vainglorious militant, turning with
cocked eye to a shock-headed youth who stood
gaping at his elbow. The boy replied with a
similar squint, and Kluckhatch ran on, detailing at
length, like a crafty plotter, the whole course of
strategy he intended to put in practice against
Behemoth, naming the time when, and the place
where, he expected to achieve his capture at least,
if not his death.
In accordance with this carefully matured plot,
one bright and cold autumn morning Kluckhatch
sallied forth accoutred to a point with dagger, hat
and sword-belt, to which was attached special
ministrant in the anticipated capture, his little
drum, with the melodious sounds of which he
expected
to quell and mollify the mighty rage of
Behemoth. Over his right shoulder he bore a
light ladder of pine of great length, with which
he intended to mount to Behemoth's neck and
inflict
the fatal wound with his trenchant blade.
Thus armed and accoutred Kluckhatch set
forth. Fortunately on the morning which he
chose for his adventure, the Mastodon was not
far off but pastured in a broad open meadow
within sight of the Mound-builders' villages.
When Kluckhatch first beheld him opening and
closing his mighty jaws as he cropped the tall
verdure, his soul trembled within him and
vibrated
to and fro, like a mariner's needle, between
the determination to retreat and that to advance.
At length however it settled down true to its
purpose
.
He marched forward beating a reveill on
his dwarfish drum, while he whistled faintly as
an accompaniment. He was now within stone's
throw of the monster. He had lowered the
ladder
from his shoulder, that he might be better
prepared to scale the sides of the Beast.
Behemoth
ceased from the labor of feeding; a moment
his eye twinkled on the puissant Kluckhatch, and
the next, unrolling his trunk, he coiled it about
the slender body of the adventurer, and lifting
him gently from the earth, as gently tossed him
some score of yards into a neighboring pond,
which was about five feet deep, and mantled with
a covering of stagnant water. Into this
Kluckhatch
descended and fell amid a noisy company of
large green bull-frogs who were holding a meeting
for general consultation and the expression of
opinion. Amid the blustering assembly the
valiant little hero fell. For a time, as he hung
balanced in the air, it was doubtful which
portion of his person would first penetrate the
water.
The levity of his head and the weight of his
splay-feet, at length brought the latter first to the
pool, and dividing the stagnant surface, they sank
through and reached a bottom of mud; still they
sank and continued to settle down deeper and
deeper. Kluckhatch knew not where his descent
would stop, nor where in the end he might arrive.
His feet at last found support just as his chin
reached the waters' edge, and, looking up, the first
object which fell upon his vision was a
household
of venerable and contemplative crows who,
seated on a dry tree at the edge of the pool,
seemed to be philosophizing over his mishaps,
in their most doleful discords. One, an old
rake, with only an eye left in his head,
appeared
to Kluckhatch, as he leered
knowingly
upon him, to be a desperate quiz. When,
after many vain efforts, he had brought his
scattered
senses into something like order, reaching
forth one hand he grasped his drum, which
floated at a distance on the pool, and held it up
tremblingly, while with the other he drew from
his belt a drum-stick which survived his fall.
Stretching out the hand that held the stick, he
struck up a faint tatoo on the parchment, with the
double purpose of driving off those accursed and
hard-hearted crows, and also to draw help from
the nearest village. To the instrumental sounds
thus elicited he added a humble vocal effort.
Here was a scene for a painter: Kluckhatch, the
drum, and the crows, all in unison, running
down the scale from lofty bass to shrill treble.
The hero soon tired of his toilsome essays at
the two kinds of music under his charge, and
putting
forth all his strength in a desperate venture,
he succeeded, scrambling, floundering, and
paddling
,
in reaching the shore endued in a
coat-of-mail
,
composed of black slime and green ooze,
with long locks of eel-grass dangling at his heels,
as trophies of his exploit. Satisfied with this
valorous attempt at the capture of the huge
blusterer, Kluckhatch skulked home.
Some two months more had passed when a new
enterprise was set on foot by a desperate band,
under
the control of two or three daring and
reckless
leaders. Their daring, however, was not
the fruit of experience, for they had not been out
with the army against the fearful enemy.
The Mastodon, with that attachment to
particular
scenes and localities, which even the brute
cherishes
to a certain degree in common with man,
had been observed to exhibit a fondness for one
spot, which seemed to be dearer to his mighty
spirit than all others. It was a wide plain, in
whose centre grew a few tall elm trees, where
Behemoth, through the oppressive hours of noon,
was wont to rest. Beside their roots bubbled a
cool rivulet, in which he sometimes cast his
limber
trunk and sported with its waters. This was
the spot where the last of his brute brethren had
fallen. Here his gigantic frame fell, and here it
reposed. The earth about Behemoth was the
dust of his mighty bones, and every green thing
which sprang from the mould drew its
nourishment
from the great Dead.
The desperate crew, to which we have
alluded
,
or rather one of their chiefs, conceived a
plan, based on the Mastodon's frequent resort to
this locality, which might eventuate in his
destruction
.
The chief, with whom it originated,
suggested that five or six bands or bodies of men
should commence mining the earth at a
considerable
depth, from so many distinct quarters,
making the ground where Behemoth was
accustomed
to repose, the common centre of their
operations. They should delve thus far below
the surface until they had reached the spot
in question, that the earth might be sufficiently
solid to bear up the weight of the prodigious
Brute, as he crossed it to and fro: but that, when
they had attained the appointed centre
subterraneously
,
they should then so far diminish the body
of earth as to leave a mere shell through which
his bulk must needs bear the Mastodon and bring
him to the bottom of the pit, thus prepared for
him, with rapid and deadly haste. The latter
part of the mining, as they approached the
centre
,
was to be conducted by means of broad
spades attached to long handles, while the miner
stood back in the subterranean halls secure from
the sudden downfalling of the heavy bulk.
The day came to put in trial this desperate
invention
for the overthrow of the heroic enemy. A
company of about five hundred men, under five
leaders, went forth to their allotted labor. Day
after
day they toiled under the earth. Cautiously in
the morning they sallied out to their duty, and at
night stole back as cautiously to their slumbers.
They had finished the whole plan in detail as
mapped out by its projector; they had hollowed
7
the earth with their far withdrawn instruments of
labor, until the weight of the Mastodon rested at
noon, casting its shadow far east, upheld but by a
thin shelf of earth. They toiled on. With his quick
intelligent ear he heard the click of their many
mattocks, and giving a bold and agile spring
wonderful for so ponderous a framehe pressed
his feet strongly upon the mould; it yielded and
fell in with dire ruin, and Behemoth landed
beyond
its fatal circle on the bright greensward,
and bellowed forth a fearful roar of triumph and
scorn.
The subterranean toilers, when they heard the
thunderous voice of Behemoth, clear and
sonorous
on high, knew that he had escaped; while
not a few of their number, whose fool-hardiness
had carried them too near the falling mass,
perished
under it. The remainder, abandoning all
things, fled, dismayed, toil-worn and discomfited,
toward their native villages.
PART SECOND.
7*
It
was two hours before sunrise. Through
the wide realm of the populous West not a soul
was stirring, save a single human figure, which
might have been seen threading its way through
the streets of one of the great cities of the
Mound-builders
.
This solitary object moved at a slow,
measured pace, as if its progress was actually
retarded
by the weight of the thoughts with which
it was engaged. The eyes gleamed as if they
beheld afar off some enterprise of magnitude and
obstinacy sufficient to call up the whole soul of
the man, and the lines of the countenance
worked
,
and he hands were clenched as if he was
already
employed in the struggle. If one could
have looked into his bosom, he might have seen
all his faculties mustering to the encounter; and
among other passions aroused and assembling
there, he might have noted discomfiture and
mortification
thrusting in their hated visages, and
lending a keener stimulus and quicker motion
to the current of his thoughts. If the power of
thus inspecting that breast were given to him, he
might have also discovered an heroic resolution,
almost epic in its proportions and strength,
towering
up from amid the ruins of many cast-down
and desolated projects, and assuming to contend
with unconquerable might.
The solitary figure was that of Bokulla, who was
thus venturing forth, self-exiled and alone, to
discover
in the broad wilderness toward the sea,
whatever
means of triumph he might, over a power that
had hitherto proved itself more than a match for
human strength or cunning. A great spirit had
taken
possession of the chieftain, and the shame of
an inglorious defeat aided to kindle the energy of
his passions. Over that defeat he had already
pondered long and anxiously. He confessed to
himself that he had formed but a vague opinion
of the hugeness and strength of Behemoth when
he had proposed the battle. But he dwelt in the
midst of a terrified and perishing people: As a
man, he was touched by the sufferings and
alarms of his nation. Danger and death were
before them, and no gate of safety or mercy
opened
.
He saw this people not only in the present
time, but through a long futurity, scourged and
suffering: the old tottering into a hasty grave,
pursued by a hideous phantom that increased its
terrors; the young growing up with images and
thoughts of fear, interwoven with their tender
and plastic elements of being.
Was there no one man in this whole nation
who would go forth, in the spirit of martyrdom
and self-sacrifice, and seek, even in the desert
itself
,
the knowledge that would bring strength and
safety in its wings? It was he that was now
passing away from his country for a while, and
launching himself in the boundless wilderness of
the West. Championed by doubt and solitude, he
was plunging into a region which stretched, he
knew not whither, and to a fate, perchance, his
heart dared not whisper to itself. What fruit
might spring from this hardy enterprise, it was
vain to conjecture; but he was determined to
gather some knowledge of the habits and some
information as to the lodgment of this terrible
scourge of his people. With rapid and firm step,
he therefore proceeded on his way. By secret
paths, and through dark woods, he advanced, and
mid-day brought him to a spot which overlooked
the whole of the wide territory of the
Mound-builders
.
He stood upon a cliff which pushed out boldly
from the wooded region that lay behind it, and
hung, like the platform of a castle, over a valley
and river that wound round its base. It was
covered
in patches with verdure and earth from
which a few stately trees threw up their branches,
and underneath these Bokulla now stood.
Casting his eye abroad he beheld a scene which
the boldest fancy of our time can scarcely
conceive
,
accustomed as we are to think of the
prairies as tenantless and houseless deserts, and
the whole broad West as a wild, unpeopled
region
never disturbed unless by bands of straggling
Indian hunters, or a mad herd of buffalo
sweeping
like a tornado over their bosom. From his
lofty stand, the self-exiled chieftain looked down
upon a country as broad as Europespread out
in the most glorious variety of hill, and vale, and
meadow, with a thousand streams intersecting the
whole, sometimes mingling with each other,
occasionally
ploughing their way through a genial
valley, or cutting deep into the heart of a mountain
whose slope was covered with forests. A
numerous
population lined their banks, or hovered
on their eminences, whose dwellings and national
edifices reared themselves in the air and darkened
the land with their number. Over those vast,
verdant deeps, the prairies, were scattered like
islands, countless cities in whose suburbs tall
towers of granite and marble sprang to the sky
and resembled the masts of ships of war just
putting
out from the shore. In another direction a
mighty bastion of earth, with its round green
summit, heaved itself into view like the back of
some huge sea monster; and the long grass of
the prairies, swept by occasional winds, rolled to
and fro and furnished the ocean-like surges on
which all these objects rode triumphant.
Upon this scene Bokulla gazed long and
earnestly while many dark thoughts and sad
emotions
followed each other like the clouds of
summer
through his mind and darkened his
countenance
as they passed. Beneath him he saw an
hundred cities devoted to ruin: tower, and
temple
,
and dwelling crumbling to the earth, and no
hand lifted to arrest their fall. A wide populace
was wasting away from a robust and manly
vigor into a pale and shadow-like decrepitude.
Day by day the august majesty of a prosperous
and ambitious nation dwindled into a shrunken
and counterfeit image of itself. To them there
was now no alternation of sunshine or shadow:
seasons passed without their fruits: the golden
summer no longer smiled in their midst, and
generous
autumn departed without a blessing and
unheeded.
To these miserable and suffering realms Bokulla
now bade farewell. His present enterprise might
be without fruit, or fraught with disastrous and
fatal results to himself: yet in the strength of
Nature he would once more presume to cope with
the dreaded enemy, for he still believed that man
must be triumphant in the end over this bestial
domination. To man the earth was given as his
kingdom, and all tribes and classes of creatures
were made his subjects and vassals. In this faith
he turned away from a scene which suggested
so many fearful topics of thought, and bent his
course toward the West, guided by such
knowledge
as he already enjoyed, and such marks as
occurred to his observation, determined to avoid
the face of man and to be familiar only wlth
solitude
and danger until some new means of
triumph
were clearly discovered. In pursuance of
this resolve he pushed forward with speed and
energy; plucking by the way wild berries and
other natural fruits as food, and drinking of the
cool shaded rivulet, his only beverage: for, from
the first moment that he had conceived the thought
of this venturous self-exile, he vowed to cast
himself
on Nature and to be received and sustained
by her as her worthy child, or to perish as an alien
and outcast on her bosom. He had therefore
come forth unprovided with food, and trusting
entirely to her bounty for a supply.
Hand in hand thus with liberal Nature, Bokulla
pressed onward until night-fall, when he halted,
and, sheltering himself safely within the hollow
of a rock, he gathered himself for repose.
Thus for many days did this solitary pilgrim
journey on, seeking no other couch but the
over-hanging
cliff or the sheltering bank, and finding
no other canopy but the broad, open sky and the
green roof of the branching tree. A constant
grandeur of soul sustained him in the midst of
many pressing hardships, and a noble purpose
bore him forward as the winds propel the eagle
that trusts to their strength. Guided by
apparent
tracks and obvious landmarks, about the
middle of the afternoon of the second day he
reached a solemn wood, into the heart of which he
made his way.
He was something wearied with travel, and
seeing the remains of a large old oak thrusting
themselves up from the tangled and chequered
shade, he seated himself upon them. The wild
underwood and smaller foliage were twisted into
a thousand fantastic shapes, which wreathed
themselves round, and the prodigal forest-flowers
had scattered their colors here and there so
profusely
over the seat which the self-exile had
chosen, as to furnish somewhat the appearance of
a rich and cushioned throne. What wonder if
the resemblance struck the excited imagination
of Bokulla, and his eye glanced about the forest
as if in search of attendants that should hedge
this seat of honor round. Am I alone here!
half-muttered the chieftain. Is all this pleasant
realm of air, and this verdurous spot of earth
void and barren! No, no; I am not in an
unpopulous
solitude even here. Airy citizens throng
about me in this remote and unfrequented wood.
Busy hopes, immortal desires, passions, longings,
and aspirations that lengthen like shadows the
nearer we approach the sunset of life. Mighty
and tumultuous wishes and emotions gather
around me in this pathless and woodland region,
and tell me I am not, that I cannot be, alone.
8
Shadowy creatures! which sway us beyond all
corporal powers and instrumentsye swarm now
in these shaded walksand foremost Ambition
and Fame, glorious twins! stand forth and tower
in cloudy stature, grasping at impossible objects
and plucking at the heavens themselves!
Immortal
powers and faculties! in these retired and
natural chambers, I know you as the internal and
silent agencies which are to guide and sustain
me through this hardy and venturous
pilgrimage
.
In this wood he found a suitable shelter and
stretched himself for sleep. Notwithstanding the
great cares with which he was oppressed, the
mind of the chieftain was visited by pleasant
dreams; and he was borne far back from the
gloomy and troubled present, into an old and
cheerful time, where every thing wore a
countenance
of joy, and a golden atmosphere floated
about all. He wandered along the banks of
mighty streams, watching the careless flight of
birds, or the idle motions of their currents, on
which many vessels of gallant trim, with every
sail set, were hastening toward the sea. Around
him a thousand familiar sounds made the
common
music of day; trumpets were sounded in
the distance; citizens were hurrying forth or
home on errands of business, or pleasure, or tender
sorrow; and all was human and delightful. The
chieftain himself seemed to have the heart of
youth, and to ramble onward amid these pleasant
scenes of life as if no morrow was coming, as if
the sun that was now in mid-heaven would never
set.
Near the close of the night, this pageant passed
away, and the slumbers of the champion were
interrupted by a loud sound, like that of a storm
gathering in the distance, and which drew
nearer
by, increasing every moment. Presently it
seemed to cross the western quarter of the wood
with a clashing and tumultuous noise, resembling
that of a great cataract, and then it passed far to
the north-west, and died away after a long time
like rattling thunder, among the distant peaks of
the mountains.
Nothing could be more alarming to the
imagination
than this midnight tumult, and Bokulla felt
that his situation was like that of the wretched
mariner
,
whose bark is dashed on the rocks of some
inhospitable shore, where night and the raging
winds press on him behind, and darkness and the
wild beast prepare to fasten on his weather-beaten
body as he strikes the land. But no sound that
Bokulla had ever known could represent the
character of that which all night long had
rebellowed
,
and thundered, and died away. The
stormy shouts of a warlike assault, the furious
outcry of popular rage, the howling of winter
winds, all commixed, would be an imperfect
image of its depth, and strength, and varying
loudness. In the morning, disturbed and
perplexed
,
he girded himself again to his task, and
shaped his course toward that region of the
forest
by which the indescribable tumult had swept.
An hour's swift travel brought him to a large
wooded slope, which presented to his view, in
the uncertain light of a sun obscured by the gray
mist of morning, an astonishing spectacle. A
thousand vast old trees, each large enough for the
main column of a temple, were dashed against
the upland and lay there, leaning half-way down,
as if they had contested against overthrow, like
mighty ships, blown over in the harbor of some
great city, when the north has burst upon them
and commanded that they should veil their
pennons
and high-aspiring standards.
From obvious footmarks he easily discovered the
course which the strength that caused this
desolation
had taken, and pursuing the indications thus
furnished, he was soon out upon an open plain.
The region that now spread before him was a
wide and trackless waste, barren, void of
vegetation
,
and apparently deserted of nature. Such
herbage
as lingered about its borders, was small,
scanty, and withered, and crept gloomily along
the dusty banks of dried-up brooks and rivulets.
Over this arid desert, as Bokulla slowly plodded,
he discovered the same large foot-prints as he had
followed all along, crossing and re-crossing each
other, sometimes diverging and again keeping
straight on, in a manner so irregular and
wandering
,
as to bewilder him, and set any attempt
to pursue them entirely at nought.
In some places the earth was ploughed up and
rent with seams recently made, and in others it
was scattered far and wide, in irregular and
broken
heaps. The whole wilderness presented an
appearance as if it had been recently trampled
by some angry and barbaric puissance, that had
swept it from end to end, like a storm.
What now rendered his situation still more
perplexing, was a circumstance which would
seem at first a source of self-gratulation and
comfort, after the fearful sounds of the preceding
8*
night. A dead silence hung all around him,
which was, if possible, more dreary and
depressing
than the unearthly noises of midnight. A
soundless and voiceless quiet filled the air, the
sky, and brooded over the inanimate sea of sand
slumbering at his feet.
Through this confused and desolate region the
chieftain resolved to make his way to the summit
of some one of the mountains that dominated
this arid plain at its farthest extremity, and from
thence, as from a citadel, look abroad and make
such discoveries as he might.
Bokulla at length reached the summit of a high
mountain, and looking forth towards the East,
he beheld a mighty region of hill and valley,
whose immensity astonished and overwhelmed
him. In one direction an hundred peaks towered
one above the other, until the farthest was lost,
it seemed, on the very threshold of the sky. In
another, torrents dashed through numerous
declivities
,
tearing down mountains, it almost
seemed
,
in their rage, and threatening to wash away
the very foundations of the earth, as they leaped
over rocks, and crags, and rugged precipices.
Huge passes and defiles that ploughed their way
through the bosoms of solid mountains, and led
down as it were to the central fires, were visible
in other quarters, and exhibited more or less of
their dreary turnpikes as the sun-light fell upon
one or the other. As Bokulla looked forth he
descried a dark object moving slowly along a
distant
peak. Sometimes it paused, and then again
advanced; at length it plunged down the
mountain-side
into a deep and dark valley, but still
some portion of it was apparent; and at intervals,
as it crossed a seam or gap that intersected
the valley, the whole figure came into view.
Thus it wound through the immense region,
almost
the whole time conspicuous to the eye of
the gazer, who, however, was unable to discover
its character, so remote was the distance at which
it moved. At length it emerged from the many
defiles and declivities, among which it had
passed
,
and came out upon the open plain.
As a numerous fleet of war ships, all their
canvass spread, double some one of the Atlantic
capes, and come within the ken of the anxious
watcher on shore, so did this vast object steer
round the mountain-base and stand before the eye
of Bokulla. Like a huge fog that has settled in
autumn upon the ground, and creeps along until
it has mastered the earth with its broad
dimensions
,
so did the stature and bulk of the
Mastodon
tower and enlarge as it drew nigh. Among
those mighty peaks, and along that
immeasurable
plain, he seemed to move the suitable and
sole inhabitant. Rocks piled on rocks, and
rivers, the parents of oceans, calling unto rivers as
large, and dreadful summits that hung over the
earth and threatened to crush it, were not its
massy plains and platforms broad enough to uphold
mountains an hundred fold vaster, this was the
proper birth-place and dwelling of the mightiest
creature of the earth.
Amid these great elements of nature, Bokulla
beheld the motions of the Mastodon as he trode
the earth in gigantic sway; and thought swelled
upon tumultuous thought, like waves that break
over each other in the middle ocean, at each step
of that unparalleled and majestic progress. What
wonder, if at that moment he deemed the great
creature before him unassailable and immortal?
Behemoth passed onward, and for the first time in
many hours was lost to the gaze of the chieftain,
as he entered a dark gap in a great mountain
range far to the East. Intent on the daring and
venturous purpose which had drawn him forth
into the wilderness, he descended from his lofty
station and shaped his course to the barriers
within which the unconquered Brute had
passed
.
With incredible labor he toiled over a
thousand
obstacles; clambering high mountains,
plodding through gloomy valleys, and
compassing
,
by contrivance sometimes, sometimes by
sheer strength, broad streams, he found himself at
length, as the night approached, fixed on a lofty
ridge, whence his eye fell upon a spacious
amphitheatre
of meadow, completely shut in by
rocks and mountains, save at a single narrow cut
or opening. In the centre of this he beheld
Behemoth
couchant (his head turned toward the
chieftain himself) like a sublime image of stone
in the middle of a silent lake. Bokulla
exhibited
no symptoms of terror or trepidation, and the
beast lay motionless and quiet. Great emotions
filled the breast of the chieftain as he looked upon
the Mastodon reposing in this fortified solitude. He
closely scrutinized the whole circle of mountains,
and took an accurate survey of the gate which led
out into the open country beyond. Among other
circumstances, he observed large hollows, here
and there, in different quarters of the plain, as if
worn there by the constant habitation of
Behemoth
;
and also, that as the wind sighed through
the branches of trees that stood in its centre and
along its border, the Mastodon moved up and
down the amphitheatre with a slow and gentle
motion as if soothed by the sound.
While he was thus engaged, night descended
upon the scene; and the dark hours were to be
passed by Bokulla alone in that far off wilderness,
and within reach of the mighty and terrible foe.
As well as he might he addressed himself to sleep;
but it was almost in vain, for it seemed as if the
fearful strength beneath was slumbering at his
side, and as if its tall, cold shadow fell upon him
and froze the very blood in his veins. Armed
beings of an inconceivable and super-human
stature passed and re-passed before his mind; and
the vision of a conflict mightier than any that his
mortal eyes had ever witnessed, in which huge
trumpets brayed and enormous shields clashed
against each other, swept along. Then it
changed
,
and it seemed as if the mountains rocked to and
fro and pent winds strove to topple down peaks
and pinnacles, while in their midst one mighty
Figure, neither of man nor of angel, stood
chained
,
and, in a deep and fearful voice, cried to the
heavens for succor. Perplexed by images and
visions like these, Bokulla wakened before the
dawn and turned his steps, with scarce any guide
or landmark, toward his own home.
And now an appalling fate was before the
champion, for he was without food in the very
centre of the desert. The liberal fare upon which
he had at first subsisted was gone long ago, and
the scanty supply which nature had lately
furnished
from hedges and meadows, had
entirely
ceased. Barrenness, barrenness, barrenness,
spread all around. After toil and exertion of body
and mind, almost beyond mortal strength, he
seemed
likely to perish in the wastes with the great
project that his soul had conceived unknown to
living man. Interminable and gloomy disasters
lowered over his country if he should perish in
the wilderness. He struggled onward with
anguish
and hunger at his heart.
At last, one day, when his strength was fast
ebbing, he espied a bird rising sluggishly from a
marshy thicket, and bearing in its pounces a
quarry which Bokulla could not distinctly
ascertain
.
He knew, however, that it must be some
esculent, and doubted not that it had been seized
by the hawk, which bore it in its clutches, as a
valuable prey. The bird had no sooner risen on
the wing, than the chieftain ran forward and
shouted with all his might, at the same time
stretching out both his hands, with the hope of
frightening the hawk, and causing her to drop
her booty. She was, however, a strong and
courageous plunderer, and fixing her talons still
deeper into the sides of her burden, which
Bokulla
had now discovered, by a feather that had
fallen, to be a plump and well-fed wood partridge,
she soared up into the sky: the weight of her
booty seeming to be such as to prevent her
from attaining a lofty flight. The chieftain was
too nearly famished to relinquish at once this
chance of food. He accordingly cast his
weather-stained
and mouldering cloak from his shoulders,
and rushed forth, keeping the fugitive barely in
sight. The hawk which had attained her
topmost
pitch, now flew level with the earth, and
with a steady and not too rapid wing. Regardless
of every other object, the pursuer pushed on,
with his face ever and anon turned up to the sky,
through brake and pool, over rocks and rugged
places, although, at times, in peril of his life.
Gaunt famine had spread her wings, and on
them, as it were, sustained, he swept along like a
wind. His heart rose and fell with every
variation
in the motions of the bird, which bore in its
clutch the precious quarry. In this way the
hawk flew on for the first day, Bokulla keeping
even with her flight, and watching it with an
anxiety that every moment increased.
At night-fall the bird alit in the upper branches
of a dry sycamore, which stood by the side of a
pool filled with its sere dead leaves, and with two
or three withered and hard-featured lizards for
its inhabitants.
The chieftain lay down at a distance and
pretended
to sleep. When he supposed the bird had
fallen into its slumbers, he crept cautiously
toward
the tree with a stout stick in his hand,
hoping to strike her dead from the perch.
He had stolen thus within a few feet of her
rest, and raising his weapon to hurl it at the head
of the hawk, he saw her bright eyes staring
through the dark; in a moment she flapped her
wings and passed wholly out of sight.
All that night Bokulla was stretched on the
earth in the most dreadful torture of mind and
body. In the dreary darkness which had settled
over all things, he could not tell whether the
frighted bird had flown from his view for ever or
not. With the first streak of morning he sprang
to his feet, and at the same time, startled by his
9
abrupt movement, the hawk again took wing
from a neighboring tree, where she had passed
the night, and put forth steadily on her journey.
Bokulla followed, with the hope that some
lucky chance would place her booty in his
possession
.
And so it well-nigh happened, for, as he
still pursued the bird, on the afternoon of this
second day, a sudden gust of wind fell from the
sky, and sweeping down upon the hawk, bore
her to within arm's length of the eager chieftain.
He immediately stretched forth the cudgel, which
he still carried, to strike her to the ground; but as
he raised his arm, the wind shifting its course,
swept her again high into the air.
The country which he had now reached
presented
the most wild and sublime aspect. On
every side of him he saw stupendous peaks,
springing up into the sky, covered from crown
to base with dazzling sheets of snow, which
looked like mighty tents pitched in the desert.
Between these a heady river roared and
brawled, like a noisy and vaunting herald
summoning
to the fight. Along its banks Bokulla
speeded. The hawk alighting on a stone which
reared its bald head in the middle of the stream,
drank of its waters. The chieftain, first imitating
her example and quaffing of the stream, taking
advantage of two or three straggling trees that
stood on its margin, stole along and hurled a
stone at the bird, which, from his feebleness, fell
far short of its mark, and pashed into the stream
with a dull, sullen sound. Again springing on
the wing, she steered her course between the
peaks of the mountains, and kept steadily
onward
.
In this way the chase continued until the
darkness set in, when the hawk fell abruptly into
a thicket of reeds, and finding a covert, settled to
rest for the night. When the day dawned
Bokulla
found himself at the foot of a rocky ascent,
sheer through the centre of which a rapid current
cut its way, breaking midway up into a
magnificent
fall, which dashed with impetuous violence
from the height into a granite basin beneath. A
little below the point where the waters thus fell,
they expanded into a quiet lake, over which the
rays of the newly-risen orb flickered, forming
here and there, over its smooth expanse, friths of
sunlight, which ran in from the centre of the
lake to the edge of the green shore.
As the sun attained a higher station in the
heavens, radiant bows began to gather over the
river, and it rushed joyously on its course through
these bright arches of its own creation. Bokulla
plunged into the reed-brake in the hope of seizing
the unwary hawk asleep on her perch, but he had
no sooner taken the first step into the covert than
she started up, and shaped her flight over the
rugged ascent before them. The journey up the
steep was too toilsome for the chieftain, and he
feared that he must abandon the pursuit.
Fortunately
,
as he was forming this desperate resolve,
he discovered a wild steed, of deep jet-black
color, browsing on the grass by the river's side.
Cautiously approaching him, Bokulla, springing
forward, seized his long, flowing mane, and
with an agility characteristic of his better days,
he vaulted upon his back and turned his head up
the ascent.
Wildly he urged him forward, and he rushed
up the rocky steep with a force and vigor similar
to that with which the cascade dashed in an
opposite
direction. His ears and crest were erect,
his tail streamed in the wind, and every muscle
was strained to its utmost power. His cap had
fallen from the chieftain's head, his cloak was
gone, and he sate on the back of the steed, his
hair floating abroad, his eyes straining eagerly
forwardpresenting the image of some goblin
horseman of the desert. Every tread of the
courser on the hard rock rang through the
wilderness
,
and Bokulla shouted him madly
forward
.
The hawk overhead, still retaining in her
talons her contested quarry, kept in the advance,
screaming with delight and apparently stirred
by the excitement of the pursuit.
In this way the gallant bird flew on, and the
mettlesome courser pursued, up the declivity and
down the opposite side. Onward they flew over
the plainthe hawk steering on in an almost
unvarying
line toward the south-east. Over hills
through forestsand along stream-sides the wild
chase continued until the afternoon of the third
day, when, just as he had emerged from a long
tract of woods, and had turned his eye toward
the sky, to recover sight of the hawk, she gave
a wild scream, a sudden wheel into the clouds,
and disappeared for ever.(1)
To his utter astonishment, the moment that the
hawk vanished a populous city burst upon his
gaze directly before him, and ere he could discern
further, the wild steed dashed down a travelled
way and was entering its streets. The
circuitous
pursuit, which had changed its direction
many
9*
times, had brought him unexpectedly to
almost
the very spot from which he had set out on
his pilgrimage. If the astonishment of Bokulla
was great at this miraculous termination of his
journey, that of the inhabitants, among whom he
was thus thrown, was no less; and as the
coal-black
steed galloped through their streets they
beheld the rider, his features gaunt and unearthly,
and his hair streaming wildly to the wind, with
amazement mingled with terror. Some fled from
his path and sought refuge in their dwellings,
while others rushed out to gaze upon him as he
scampered, wild and spectre-like, along the
distance
;
and others gathered together, and in
subdued
voices, conjectured or canvassed the
character
of the sudden apparition. Many wild
guesses and shrewd suggestions were ventured.
This is a fiend of the prairie, said one. He
that rambles up and down the big meadow,
blowing
his horn, and who calls the wolves and
goblins
together when a carcass is thrown out or a
traveller perishes in crossing them.
It is a lunatic escaped from his friends, said
a second, who has been out seeking his wits in
the mountains.
You are wide of the mark, my good sirs, said
a sharp eyed little man, glaring about and looking
up at the windows as if afraid of being overheard;
and the group pressed more closely about him
as if expecting a communication of great weight
and shrewdnessa whole bow-shot wide of the
mark:it is the keeper of Behemoth!
At this they all turned pale and lifted up their
eyes in astonishment, and admitted that nothing
could be nearer the truth.
By this time Bokulla had reached his own
door, and throwing himself from his steed of the
desert prepared to enter in; but ere he could
effect
this object, several stout citizens pressed
before
him and arrested his steps.
Wherefore is this? said the foremost. Will
you rush into a house of mourning in this guize?
Know you not that this is the mansion of
Bokulla
,
the championand that his widow is in
sack-cloth
and tears within? Begone elsewhere,
madman
!
This remonstrance was seconded by another,
and a third, until it swelled so high that the
crowd would have seized him and wreaked some
injury upon his person, had he not succeeded in
obtaining a moment's pause; and standing on an
elevation, he shouted out, Peace,
Mound-builders
!it
is Bokulla before you!
At this declaration many began to recognise in
the shrunken features and toil-worn frame before
them, their great champion and chieftain, and a
shout was raised, life and health to Bokulla,
the father of his country! Pleasant dew fall
upon him! Long may he tread the green earth
under his feet! and many national invocations
and blessings.
The rumor now spread rapidly abroad, and
the cry was taken up wherever it reached and
renewed
with hearty good-will, for all were rejoiced
at the return of their great leader, whom some
had considered lost for ever; and who all
admitted
was the only one that could contend, with
any chance of success, against their barbaric foe.
Even the little group of gossips that had construed
him into a fiend, a lunatic, and the keeper of
Behemoth
,
but a moment before, now rushed eagerly
forward and were among the first to welcome him
back, the sharp eyed little man invoking a special
blessing on his pleasant countenance, which
looked
,
he said, like that of a saving angel.
Escaping
from these numerous tokens of admiration
and regard, Bokulla withdrew into his dwelling,
and the crowd, after lingering about for many
hours to glean such information as they might of
his absence, and to catch a view of his person, at
length dispersed, each, he knew not why, with a
lighter heart, and more joyous look, than had
fallen
to his lot for many long and weary months.
From the dwelling of Bokulla let us turn
our steps for a while toward the suburbs of the
city, and enter the sick chamber of Kluckhatch,
the blusterer. The adventure of that valiant
pretender
against Behemoth had been accompanied
with serious, and, from the aspect they at present
assumed, perhaps fatal consequences. The alarm
of spirits which he had suffered, together with the
dreary submersion in the pool, had thrown the
adventurer into a violent ague. Day by day the
malady became more tyrannical, and the mind of
Kluckhatch more fretful and restless. His soul
seemed like the sun to expand as it approached
its final eclipse, and nature, who, at his birth,
had exhibited the art and skill of a
bottle-conjuror
in crowding so puissant a spirit into so
narrow a body, now seemed at a loss to drive
the obstinate tenant from its residence. The little
man clung more desperately to life the more
forcible the attempt made to wrest it from him.
The pale Ague assailed him with its whole band
of forces; throttling him by the throat, as it were,
it essayed by rough and uncorteous usage to
shake the vital spirit from him, but it adhered
closer and closer, and the attempt of nature to
cast off the pigmy militant, resembled that of a
horse, in whose flank on a mid-summer's day a
burr has chanced to fix itself: he feels annoyed
and irritatedhe whisks the hairy brush to and
frohe runshe gallopshe rearshe plunges,
but all in vain, the barbarous annoyance clings
to him with the more zeal, until, at some quiet
moment, it drops gently from its hold and
disturbs
him no more. Thus stood the account
between
Nature and Kluckhatch. In his bed he
lay, trembling like an earthquake or an ocean,
under the coverlid. After a while the ague
relaxed
and the fever came on, and then he sat up
in his couch and grasping a wooden sword, which
had been made to amuse his sick and
distempered
fancy, he made airy thrusts and lounges,
and called out as if he were plunging it deep in
invisible ribs, or hacking at the head of some
monstrous chimera. Then again he would
appear
to seize the end of some palpable object, and
drawing it along would measure and cut off
pieces of a yard in length at a time. It was
evident
,
from the whole tenor of his strange action,
that the Mastodon was in his phantasy; and this
was amply confirmed by his breaking out, after
the fever had partially subsided, into the
following
wild invective, into which his soul seems to
have thrown its whole collected powers:
This huge bully: this fleshly continent: this
vagabond traveller: this beast mountain: this
tornado in leather: this bristly goblin: (Pray be
calm, Kluckhatch, whispered the shock-headed
youth, who stood at his bed-side terrified and
quaking): this huge moving show: this
two-horned
wonder: this tempest of bull's beef: this
land leviathan: fiend: wood-elf: this devil's
ambassador: this territory of calves' hide
stretched
on a mountain: this untanned libel on
leather-dressers
:
this unhung homicide: (Uncle
Kluckhatch, again interrupted his attendant,
Uncle Kluckhatch, wherefore do you rail after
this fashion? you but madden your fever):
this Empire of bones and sinew: this monstrous
Government on legs: this Tyrant with a tail:
this rake-helly: this night-brawler: this
measureless
disgust: this lusty thresher with his
endless
flail: this magnified ox: this walking
abomination
:
this enormous Discord sounding in bass:
this huge, tuneless trombone
The sick dwarf fell back on his pillow
exhausted
,
his lips still moving as if laden with other
bitter epithets of denunciation. His hour now
rapidly drew nigh. His strength gradually ebbed
away, and at length the conviction that he must
die forced its way into the heavy brain of
Kluckhatch
.
In a few words he made his humble and
of course lean will. I leave, said he to his
gaping companionI leave to you my fame,
my virtues, and my drum! He then gave
directions
for his burial, which, if obeyed, would
make it a spectacle rare and unexampled: and,
rising once more in his bed, he said he wished to
expire in a sitting attitude.
The last sinking wave of life was dying upon
the shore. His simple attendant had taken in his
hand, to survey its fashion and properties, the
testamentary bequest of his departing friend.
Strike up! strike up once more! exclaimed
Kluckhatch, as his eye kindled with the gleam of
death, and as the first sounds rolled from the
drum, under the obedient hand of its new
possessor
,
the spirit of the pretender, mingling with
them, left the earth.
The second morning after his death, at an early
hour, the funeral procession set out from the
domicil of Kluckhatch for the tomb of his
fore-fathers
:
a snug family-vault just beyond the
skirts of the town. Under the direction of the
shock-headed youth, who enacted the master of
ceremonies, the solemn cavalcade was drawn up
and proceeded in the following order:
First, led on by the legatee himself, in front of
whose person hung suspended the testamentary
drum, hobbled slowly along a sorry and
cadaverous
jade, which had been the pack-saddle of
Kluckhatch in his strolling tours. One eye of
the sad creature was wholly closed and useless,
but the other, as if to make amends, was a
sea-green
orb of twice the ordinary dimension, and
with its ample circle of white blazed like the
moon crossing the milky-way in the sky. His
lank, hollow body bore clear evidence of the
neglected
meadows and scant mangers of the
Mound-builders
;
for he had been on fast (broken by
occasional spare morsels) for more than a month,
and glided along in the procession like a spectre.
Behind this monkish-looking beast followed a
low wagon or four-wheeled cart, drawn by a pair
of venerable and spiritless bisons, in which sate
10
the blusterer himself, erect, and in the costume of
every-day life, his strange red coat, shining, like
a meteor, conspicuous from afar, while his conical
cap nodded gaily to the one side or the other, as
the wind swayed it. The strange whipster held
the reins firmly between his skeleton fingers and
exhibited on his countenance a broad, ghastly
grin, which, at the first view, startled the
beholders
,
but after they had recovered from the shock,
caused them to burst into a hearty laugh. On
each side of the vehicle, thus strangely driven,
marched, in serious order, six sturdy men, each
bearing a huge rustic pipe or whistle, wrought of
reed, on which they blew soft and melancholy
music. Behind the wagon, the favorite dog of
Kluckhatch, crest-fallen and whining, was led in
a string. In the rear of this faithful mourner
followed the friends and admirers of the
deceased
,
and after these scrambled a promiscuous
rout of his town's-people, of every variety, age,
sex and hue.
Creation itself, both overhead and on the earth,
was something in unison with the grotesque
obsequies
.
The sky resembled the bottom of a
rich sea suddenly disclosed. In one quarter a vast
cloud, like a whale, floundered and tumbled over
the azure depths. In another, the clouds lay
piled in heaps of shining silver; here they
assumed
the form of a shattered wreck, fleecy
vapors standing out as mast or bowsprit, with
evanescent bars for rigging, and there a black and
jagged mass of them stretched along like a reef
of dangerous and stubborn rocks. Lower down,
a small, dismantled fragment, mottled with white
sunlit scales, represented a mackerel at full length,
opening his mouth and biting at the tail of a
cloudy grampus, that stood rampant just over
head. In the mid-air, drawn thither by the
strangely exposed remains of Kluckhatch, a
sable-coated
troop of ravens kept the procession
company
,
occasionally demanding, in coarse, rude
clamors, their reversionary right in the deceased.
Now and then a timid bird put forth his head
from the trees and bushes at the road-side, and
twittering for a moment, and seeming to smile at
the defunct rider, hopped back into its cool hiding
place.
In a little while they reached the place of
burial; a small, suburban vault, the passage to
which, through a wooden door, led down to a
score of cells or apartments, all of which, save
one, were occupied. Over the entrance to the
vault stood the weather-bleached skeleton of a
robustious ancestor of Kluckhatch, balancing on
one of his short, stout legs, flourishing the other
as if in the act of going through a pirouette
and holding in his out-stretched right hand the
effigies of an owl, the favorite family-bird and
device.
For what reason, or whether for any, the little,
queer skeleton occupied this position, it would
be now difficult to decide. Perhaps in his
life-time
he had been a hard, weather-beaten hunter,
who preferred to be left thus in the free, naked
air, and under the open sky, which during life
he had enjoyed without stint or circumscription.
Passing underneath the figure of this portentous
guardian and through the passage, they bore the
mortal remains of the last of the Kluckhatch's,
and placed them in their upright posture in the
only cell which remained untenanted. The
moment
it was known that the corse was deposited
in its final place of rest, the twelve stout whistlers
let off four successive volleys of their peculiar
music; the dog came forward and howled, and
the shock-headed youth stood at the entrance of
the vault sobbing and weeping, while the beast,
whose halter he held in his hand, silently
devoured
the drum-head, and looked inside for
further viands. A few moments more and the
door was closed for ever between the world and
Kluckhatch.
The unexpected departure of Bokulla from
their midst had been a source of fruitful and
anxious
speculation to the Mound-builders. They
were conscious of his absence, as if the great orb
itself had left the skies and deprived the earth of
its light and influence. His presence diffused
amongst them the only cheerful ray that
enlightened
their gloomy condition; and although his
recent enterprise had proved disastrous, they
were satisfied that the great chieftain would
promptly grasp the first favoring circumstance
and energetically use it against the fearful foe.
Of the causes of his absence none were advised,
nor as to the direction his steps had taken. Some
dreaded lest he had gone forth to perish by his own
hand in the wilderness; and by these scouts had
been dismissed in every quarter to bring back the
fugitive warrior, or his body, for honorable
sepulture
if he had perished. The agitation and fear,
excited by the causeless and unexplained absence
of Bokulla, were only less than those occasioned
by the terrible presence of the Mastodon. His
10*
return, therefore, was welcomed with every
demonstration
of rejoicing. Lights were displayed
as glad signals, from every tower; processions
and cavalcades were formed to make triumphal
marches through the realm, and bodies of
citizens
constantly gathered under the window of
the chieftain to express their delight at his
return
.
During a whole week this universal
festivity
was sustained, and it seemed as if the
flower
of national hope once more blossomed in their
midst. Merry games were celebrated in their
gardens: religious worship again assumed its
robe, and walked forth with serene and placid
features
in the traces of its early duty.
What gave additional animation to this
unwonted
scene was, that Behemoth, during its
continuance
,
ceased to sadden or alarm them with
his presence; it may have been that the dazzling
splendor of the illumination, and the loud sound
of innumerable instruments all playing together,
kept him back.
About two weeks after the return of the
self-exiled
chieftain, and at the close of their joyous
celebrations, he appeared before the
Mound-builders
,
and declared that his strange and
unexplained
absence had not been without its uses.
Nature
,
he said, had put forth her mighty hand
and generously furnished the means of
deliverance
.
Liberty was now before them, but it must
be attained through many perils and through toil,
sanctified, perchance, with blood. Like the
swimmer
that nears the shore, they must now buffet
the wave of hostile fortune with their sternest
strength. It might be that once more the firm
and smiling continent of joy, of honor, and peace,
could be reached. If so, heaven should be
praised
with a deep sense of gratitude, and the realm
should ring through all its borders with sounds of
glorious triumph!
He then stated that he had discovered in his
wanderings a mighty meadow where Behemoth
was wont to pasture; and that if they would
choose a delegation to visit it in company with
himself, he would endeavor to point them to a
sure and safe method of subduing the enemy.
At this suggestion the populace shouted loudly
and echoed the name of Bokulla with the most
eager and fervent expressions of admiration.
They readily appointed three eminent citizens to
accompany him. The next morning they set
out, and having in due course of time reached
the locality, they selected an elevation which
commanded the whole prospect at once.
All admitted, as they looked upon the high
walls that girt the broad and spacious meadow,
and on the single narrow opening which led
from the enclosure, that nature had furnished an
extraordinary aid toward the capture of the
invincible
brute. Far around on both sides from
the central position which they occupied, the
stupendous upright battlement of mountains
stretcheda peak here and there shooting up an
immense tower, and a crag occasionally thrusting
itself forth from the general mass of
perpendicular
rocks like the quaint head of a beast, or the
rugged and ugly features of a human being, as
the fancy chose to give it shape and likeness.
The whole hedged in a meadow covered with
a fertile growth of tall, rich verduredotted by
a few scattered treesand intersected by a stream
of considerable breadth and depth, which flowed
through its centre, and formed an outlet in a
narrow
passage underneath the mountains. The
natural opening leading from this broad
enclosure
,
was about five hundred feet wide, and
walled on either side by gigantic fragments of
stone, from whose huge posterns it seemed as if
in an earlier age of the world an immense gate
may have swung and shut in captives of mighty
size and fearful guilt. Nothing could be
conceived
a more secure and dreadful prison than
these vast walls of rock: and no solitude could
be more dreary than one thus fortified as it were
by nature, and made sublimely desolate by
barriers
and enclosures like these.
All felt, thus gazing, the grandeur of the
thought presented to their mind by Bokulla, and
they turned and looked upon the countenance of
the chieftain as if they expected to discover there
features more than human. Bokulla stood silent.
He wished the great plan to sink deep in their
minds, while they were on the very spot where it
had its birth, and where it was to achieve (if
fortune permitted) its eventful success.
The thought is mighty and worthy of
Bokulla
!
at length, exclaimed one of his
companions
,
a man of a generous and ardent heart;
Here we triumph or the story of our life closes in
endless defeat, and our fate makes us and ours
perpetual bondmen.
Who is it, interposed a second of less
sanguine
temper, who is it that dare visit the
panther
in his den? or grasp the thunder from its
cloud on the mountain top?It were as safe to
climb into the eagle's nest as disturb this
monstrous
creature in his lair!
Terrible as the North when it lightens and
is full of stormsinexorable as death, will be
the encounter! cried a supporter of the second
speakerI would sooner plunge headlong from
a tower, than venture within this guarded
enclosure
!
What say you, my friends! cried Bokulla,
springing to his feet, what say you to an
embassy
to the brute on bended knee? I doubt not
if we came as humble worshippers and
suppliants
,
and consented to choose him as our national
idol, he would abate something of his fierceness!
Now heaven and all good planets forbid!
cried his companions, with one accord.
Nothing better and nothing nobler, then, may
be tried, than the great suggestion of Bokulla!
said the first speaker. Here let us wrestle with
fate and die, then, if die we must, in this broad
and open arena, where the heavens themselves,
and the inexorable stars, shall be witnesses of our
struggle!
Taking up their position on an elevated rock,
shaded by trees which overlooked the whole
scene, they consulted as to the most proper and
speedy method of accomplishing their purpose.
After a consultation of several hours, during
which the sun had fallen far in the west, and
after weighing anxiously every circumstance that
could have bearing or influence on the event,
they determined in their open council-chamber,
amid the solemn silence of the wilderness, that
an attempt must be made to imprison Behemoth
in the vast, natural dungeon at their feet, by
building a stout wall across its present opening.
And furthermore, that it would be matter of
after thought to decide, if successful in the first,
by what means his death was to be wrought.
Their resolves had scarcely taken this shape,
when a heavy shadow fell suddenly in their
midst, as if a thick cloud had covered the sun,
and looking forth for its source, they beheld
Behemoth walking silently and ponderously along
the ridge of the opposite mountains.(2) They
arrested their deliberations, and rising in a body,
watched the progress and actions of the Brute.
In a short time he descended from the summit,
and attaining its foot by a sloping and broad path,
in a moment presented himself at the gap, which
conducted into the mountainous amphitheatre.
Stalking through, he advanced to its far
extremity
,
and stretching himself on the bank of the
stream, and in the cool shadow of the mountains,
he prepared for repose.
His companions had already learned from
Bokulla
,
that the Mastodon was in the habit of
paying long periodical visits to this place, and of
feeding, for considerable periods of time, on its
abundant and savory verdure. Nothing could
have been more opportune to their consultation
than the arrival of Behemoth. His sudden
coming was an argument for activity and
despatch
.
The fifth day from this, the Mound-builders
arrived
in considerable numbers, in a wood near
the amphitheatre, bringing with them in wagons
the tools and implements required in the
proposed
labor. They immediately set about the
task, and commenced hewing large blocks of stone
and dragging them to the mouth of the gap, but
not so near as to obstruct it. The whole body
of workmen that had come from the
Mound-builders'
villages had labored at this task for a
week, and they found that in that time sufficient
stone had been hewn to build the wall from base
to summit. Each block was more than twelve
feet square, and through its centre was drilled a
hole of some six inches diameter, in which to
insert bars of metal, to bind them more firmly
together
.
As soon as they were prepared to commence
the erection of the wall, which was the most
critical part of their labors, four or five separate
bands of musicians were stationed at the farther
end of the enclosure, and near to Behemoth: for
they knew, from Bokulla's report, that the
Mastodon
,
mighty and terrible as he was, could be
soothed by the influence of music, adroitly
managed
.
The moment the work of heaving the vast
square blocks one upon the other began, the
musicians
,
at a given signal, commenced playing,
and during the progress of the labor, ran through
all the variety of gentle tunes: so that the wall,
like that of Amphion, sprang up under the spell
of music. So cunningly did the different bands
master their instruments, that, at three different
times, when the Mastodon had turned his step
toward the gap at which the Mound-builders
labored, they lured him back and held him
spell-bound
and motionless.
The blocks were hoisted to their places by
11
cranes, and the utmost silence was observed in
every movement; not even a voice was lifted to
command, but every direction was given with
the pointed finger. No one moved from his
station
during the hours of toil, but each stood on
his post and executed his portion of the task
like a part of the machinery. And yet there was
no lack of spirit; every one labored as if for his
own individual redemption, and one who beheld
them plying amid the massive fragments of
granite, silent and busy, might have thought that
they were some rebellious crew of beings brought
into the wilderness by a genius or necromancer,
and there compelled, speechless and
uncomplaining
,
to do his bidding.(3)
They labored in this way for more than a
month, and at the end of that time, Bokulla
proclaimed
from its summit that the wall was
completed
.
At the announcement, the whole host of
artizans and laborers, and innumerable women
and children, who had come from the villages,
sent up a shout that rent the air. Behemoth
heard it, and, listening only for a moment, browsed
on among the tall grass as if regardless of its
source and its object. In a few days, however,
after the music had ceased its gentle influence,
and the supply of pasturage began to be less
luxuriant
,
the Mastodon made progress toward the
old outlet, with the determination of seeking food
elsewhere.
He, of course, sought an outlet in vain, and
found himself standing at the base of an immense
rampart, which shot sheer up two hundred and
fifty feet in air. He surveyed the structure, and
soon discovered that it was no trifling barrier, but
a mighty pile of rocks, that showed themselves
almost as massive and firm as the mountains
which they bound together. At first Behemoth
thought although it would be idle to attempt
to shake the whole mass at once, that yet the
separate parts might be removed block by block.
With this purpose he endeavored to force his
white tusks between them, but it was in vain;
they were knit too firmly together to be sundered.
At length the great Brute was maddened by these
fruitless efforts, and retreating several hundred
rods, he rushed against the wall with tremendous
strength and fury.
The Mound-builders, who overlooked the
structure, trembled for its safety, but it stood stiff,
and the shock caused Behemoth to recoil
discomfited
,
while the earth shook with the weight and
violence of the motion. Over and over again
these assaults were repeated, always with the
same result. Wearied with the attempt, the
Mastodon
desisted, and returned to feed upon the
diminished pasturage, which he had before
deserted
.
He had soon browsed on it to its very
roots, and began to feed on the commoner grass
and weeds, scarcely palatable. In a day these
had all vanished, and he turned to the trees which
were here and there scattered over the meadow.
These he devoured, foliage, limb, and trunk.
In a few days they were wholly exhausted, and
the enclosed plain was reduced to a desert
pastureless
,
herbless, and treeless.
The impatience and wrath of Behemoth now
knew no bounds. He saw no possible mode of
escape from this dreary and foodless waste.
Around and around the firm Colosseum which
enclosed him, he rushed maddened, bellowing,
and foaming.
At times, in his fury, he pushed up the almost
perpendicular sides of the mountains and recoiled,
bringing with him shattered fragments of rock and
large masses of earth, with fearful force and
swiftness. Around and around he again galloped
and trampled, shaking the very mountains with
his ponderous motions, and filling their whole
circuit with his terrible howlings and cries. The
Mound-builders, who stood upon the wall, and on
different parts of the mountains, shrunk back
affrighted and awe-stricken before the deadly
glare of his eye, and the fearful and agonizing
sound of his voice.
Day by day he became more furious, and his
roar assumed a more touching and dreadful
sharpness
.
All sustenance was gone from the plain.
The whole space within his reach furnished
nothing but rocks and earth, for he had already
drunk the stream dry to its channel.
The mighty Brute was perishing of hunger in
the centre of his prison.
His strength was now too far wasted to admit
of those violent and gigantic efforts which he had
at first made to escape from the famine-stricken
enclosure, and he now stalked up and down its
barren plain, uttering awful and heart-rending
cries. Some of the Mound-builders who heard
them, and who saw the agonies and sufferings of
Behemoth, although he had been their most cruel
enemy, could not refrain from tears. So
universal
is humanity in its scope, that it can feel for
every thing that has life.
7*
Howling and stalking, like a shadow momently
diminishing, he walked to and fro in this way for
many days. Hunger hourly extended its mastery
through his immense frame. At about mid-day
in the third week of his imprisonment, he cast
his eye upon the cavernous and now dusty
opening
through which the river that watered the
plain had been accustomed to find its way. It was
broad and open and of considerable height. Into
this Behemoth now turned his steps. Its mouth
was larger than the inner passage, for time and
tempest had worn away the rocks which once
guarded it.
As he advanced it diminished, and ere his
whole bulk had entered the channel, it became
so narrow and confined that he was forced to sink
on his knees, in order to make further progress.
This labor soon proved vexatious and toilsome,
and the Mastodon, willing to force a way where
one was not to be found, or to perish in the
endeavor
,
raised himself slowly toward an upright
position.
The remnant of his strength proved to be
fearful
,
for, as his broad shoulders pressed upon the
rocks above him, the incumbent mountain
trembled
,
and when he had attained his full stature by
a last powerful effort, the impending rocks rolled
back and forth, and fell with a resounding crash
and in great fragments to the earth. The whole
cone of the mountain had been loosened from its
base, and leaning for a moment, like a lurid cloud,
in mid-air, fell into the plain with terrible ruin,
bearing down a whole forest of trees and the
earth in which they had taken root.
Fortunately for Behemothunfortunately for
the object of the Mound-buildersthe rocks
which immediately over-hung Behemoth, though
rent in several places, did not give way, but so
interlocked
and pressed against each other as to
form a solid arch over his head and leave him
unharmed
amid the ruins. Passage through the
channel was, however, wholly arrested by the
large masses of earth that had fallen into it, and
Behemoth finding it vain to attempt to pass
farther onward, withdrew.
The fatal time drew nearer and nearer.
Hundreds
and thousands of the Mound-builders
gathered
from every quarter of the Empire to look
upon the last hour of the mighty Creature which
lay extended, in his whole vast length, in the plain.
A catastrophe and show like that was not to be
foregone, for it might never (and so they prayed)
come again. Death and the Mastodon held a
fearful
encounter in the arena below. Nations looked
down from the wall and the mountains on the
strange and terrible spectacle.
To and fro the whole famished bulk moved
with the convulsions, and spasms, and devouring
agonies of hunger. At times the Brute raised his
large countenance toward heaven, and howled
forth a cry which, it seemed, might bring down
the gods to his succor.
On the fortieth day Behemoth died and left his
huge bones extended on the plain like the wreck
of some mighty ship stranded there by a Deluge,
to moulder century after century, to be scattered
through a continent by a later convulsion, and,
finally, to become the wonder of the Present
Time.
INTRODUCTORY NOTE.
The
chief object of the following notes is to
confirm what may seem the hazardous assertions of
the text, and to show that imagination, wherever
practicable, has helped itself cautiously forward
by a hand placed on the shoulder of fact. Many of
the extracts from antiquarian or scientific works,
may seem to the general reader of unusual length,
but he may rest assured, that they all contain
matter
in which he may reasonably feel some interest.
The facts connected with the subjects of this work,
have furnished for many years topics for the zealous
and enthusiastic research and discussion of
intelligent
Americans throughout the whole country,
and which are likely to prove more attractive to the
imagination, the farther we recede from the gray
and venerable age in which they existed. As our
own history assumes a prouder and loftier crest in
the noonday concourse and throng of nations, she
will more fondly and reverently cast back her regards
toward the first fountains of her origin. Is it too
much a pastime of the fancy to believe that, as
Americans, in the progress of time, attain the
stature
of a generous manhood, they will more
affectionately
grasp the shadowy hand extended to them
by that dead old nation that built the mounds. The
swifter the present time yields its concerns and
its labors to the simple agency of steam and iron,
the more earnestly, it seems to me, will it look back
to that great embodiment of natural and
unmechanical
strength, the Mastodon of the western
prairie. As men and day-laborers we dwell in the
presentas gods and diviner beings, we reside in the
past and the future!
History nor chronicle presents to the mind a
more august or imposing subject of speculation
than the unrecorded race that has departed like a
shadow, from the glorious and magnificent west.
Here we can enjoy a spectacle of which the
imagination
is chief architect, where no vulgar
circumstance
intrudes, and where the actors are heroic
and all the decorations in the highest style the fancy
chooses to furnish. On the great rivers of the west
we may launch, in that remote and doubtful age,
the mightiest ships with wide spread sails, and on
their banks we may rear the gorgeous palace and
solemn temple without the meaner aid of builder
or mason. Who shall gainsay the cheerful and
glorious labors of the fancy? Into our minds let
a thousand tender and affecting thoughts enter of
the lovers that have wooed, and wooed in vain, of
hearts that have broken in the agony of sharp
bereavements
,
of ambition deposed and genius
blighted
within the walls of that ancient and departed
people. Who will refuse to the heart this
melancholy
pleasure! It is good for us to have that part
of our nature which connects us with far-off times,
12
awakened and kindled. A decaying bone, an old
helmet, a mouldering fragment of wall or
hearth-stone
,
may call us back into centuries that are gone,
and make us feel our kindred with generations
buried long ago.
NOTE TO PREFACE.
The
following passages are quoted from the
interesting
paper on
The Gigantic Mastodon
, in
Godman's
American Natural History
.
In various parts of North America single bones
of extraordinary size had been occasionally
disinterred
,
without exciting more than temporary
curiosity
,
or leading to any thing better than wild and
unsatisfactory
speculation. Some persons regarded
them as the relics of a gigantic race of men, of whose
existence no other traces remained: others, who
appeared
willing to surpass all absurdity, suggested
that they might have belonged to the
angels
who
were expelled their celestial habitations; while a
third, and more rational party, concluded that they
were the bones of an animal still in existence, or
belonged
to a larger variety of the well known
elephant
species. The inquiry generally ceased when
the novelty of their discovery passed away; those
by whom they were found were in pursuit of other
objects, and very frequently neglected to preserve
the fragments already obtained. But when
situations
were explored where they were procured in
greater abundance, and the curiosity of European
naturalists was awakened, these relics were eagerly
sought for, until nearly a whole skeleton was
obtained
;
the fact satisfactorily established, that these
bones belonged to a peculiar race never before
known, and, what was still more surprising, that the
whole race was utterly extinct.
We find as early as the year 1712, a letter from
Dr. Mather to Dr. Woodward, published in the
Philosophical Transactions, announcing that some
bones and teeth of a monstrous size had been
discovered
at Albany in New-York. In the year 1739,
some savages belonging to the company of a French
officer, named Longueil, who was descending the
Ohio to the Mississippi, found, at a short distance
from the river, at the edge of a marsh, some bones,
grinders and tusks, belonging to this unknown
animal
.
The year after Longueil took to Paris a
thighbone
,
the extremity of a tusk, and three grinders,
which are still preserved there. Since that time
these bones have been discovered in many places;
though, in consequence of the notice first attracted
by the specimens found on the Ohio river, the name
of Animal of the Ohio had been bestowed on this
creature, yet this name, and that of Mammoth, have
at length been entirely superseded by that proposed
by Cuvier. About the year 1740, vast numbers of
these bones, which had been washed up by the
current
of the Ohio, or were purposely digged for, were
found in Kentucky. The eagerness to procure them,
and the haste with which they were sent to Europe,
retarded the knowledge of the true character of the
animalas it became impossible to procure or
recognise
the bones belonging to different skeletons,
or to determine their exact numbers and
proportions
.
Over France, England and Germany, they
were in this manner scattered in confusion; and we
need not be surprised that naturalists were long in
forming just ideas of the character of the animal, or
indulged so much the disposition to maintain theories
established on such slight foundations. The force of
prejudice may be clearly seen in the perseverance
with which Buffon, and some other scientific men,
maintained that these bones belonged to a variety of
the elephant race; for if he admitted that they did not
belong to that kind, he must have acknowledged that
they were the bones of an extinct genus, which was
an idea not then proposed, but has since most amply
been proved true, and a vast number of extinct
species
discovered. It was not until the year 1801, a
period of eighty-nine years from the first discovery of
the bones at Albany, that any hopes were
entertained
,
of finding an entire skeleton of this wonderful
and interesting animal. In the year 1824, a
considerable
part of a skeleton was raised in New-Jersey
by some scientific gentlemen of New-York; but
they have not discovered any thing more than was
previously made known by the exertions of Messrs.
Peale; the head, which is the only important part
wanting, was too much decomposed to enable them
to form any idea of its figure.
The emotions experienced, when for the first
time we behold the giant relics of this great animal,
12*
are those of unmingled awe. We cannot avoid
reflecting
on the time when this huge frame was
clothed
with its peculiar integuments, and moved by
appropriate
muscles; when the mighty heart dashed
forth its torrents of blood through vessels of
enormous
caliber, and the Mastodon strode along in
supreme
dominion over every other tenant of the
wilderness
.
However we examine what is left to us, we
cannot help feeling that this animal must have been
endowed with a strength exceeding that of other
quadrupeds, as much as it exceeded them in size;
and, looking at its ponderous jaws, armed with teeth
peculiarly formed for the most effectual crushing of
the firmest substances, we are assured that its life
could only be supported by the destruction of vast
quantities of food.
Enormous as were these creatures during life,
and endowed with faculties proportioned to the bulk
of their frames, the whole race has been extinct for
ages. No tradition nor human record of their
existence
has been saved, and but for the accidental
preservation of a comparatively few bones, we should
never have dreamed that a creature of such vast
size and strength once existed,nor could we have
believed that such a race had been extinguished for
ever. Such, however, is the factages after ages
have rolled awayempires and nations have risen,
flourished, and sunk into irretrievable oblivion, while
the bones of the Mastodon, which perished long
before
the period of their origin, have been discovered,
scarcely changed in color, and exhibiting all the
marks of perfection and durability. That a race of
animals so large, and consisting of so many species,
should become entirely and universally extinct, is a
circumstance of high interest;for it is not with the
Mastodon as with the Elephant, which still
continues
to be a living genus, although many of its
species
have become extinct:the entire race of the
Mastodon has been utterly destroyed, leaving
nothing
but the mighty wreck of their skeletons, to
testify that they once were among the living
occupants
of this land.
NOTES TO PART FIRST.
Note (1)Page 6.
Atwater
in his
Western Antiquities
, a work
full of curious information on the subjects of which
it treats, gives the following description of the
fortifications
at Circleville, Ohio:
There are two forts, one being an exact circle,
the other an exact square. The former is
surrounded
by two walls with a deep ditch between them
the latter is encompassed by one wall without any
ditchthe former was sixty-nine rods in diameter,
measuring from outside to outside of the circular
outer wallthe latter is exactly fifty-five rods square,
measuring the same way. The walls of the
circular
fort were at least twenty feet in height,
measuring
from the bottom of the ditch before the
town of Circleville was built. The inner wall was
of clay taken up probably in the northern part of
the fort where was a low place, and is still
considerably
lower than any other part of the work.
The outside wall was taken from the ditch which is
between these walls, and is alluvial, consisting of
pebbles worn smooth in water and sand, to a very
considerable depth, more than fifty feet at least.
The outside of the wall is about five or six feet in
height now; on the inside the ditch is at present,
generally not more than eighteen feet. They are
disappearing before us daily and will soon be gone.
The walls of the square fort are at this time, where
left standing, ten feet in height. There were eight
gateways or openings leading into the square fort,
and only one in the circular fort. Before each of
these openings was a mound of earth perhaps four
feet high, forty feet perhaps in diameter at the
base, and twenty or upwards at the summit. These
mounds for two rods or more, are exactly in front of
the gateways, and were intended for the defence of
these openings.
As this work was a perfect square, so the
gateways
and watch towers were equi-distant from
each other. These mounds were in a perfectly
straight line, and exactly parallel with the wall.
D (The reader is referred to a plate) shows the
site of a once very remarkable ancient mound
of earth, with a semicircular pavement on its
eastern
side, nearly fronting, as the plate represents the
only gateway leading into the fort. This mound is
entirely removed; but the outline of the
semicircular
pavement may still be seen in many places,
notwithstanding the dilapidations of time and those
occasioned by the hand of man. This mound, the
pavement, the walk from the east to its elevated
summit, the contents of the mound, &c., will be
described under the head of mounds.
The earth in these walls was as nearly
perpendicular
as it could be made to lie. This fort had
originally but one gateway leading from it on its
eastern side, and that was defended by a mound of
earth several feet in height. Near the centre of
this work was a mound with a semicircular
pavement
on its eastern side, some of the remains of
which may still be seen by an intelligent observer.
The mound has been entirely removed so as to
make the street level where it once stood.
B (Referring to a plate) is a square fort adjoining
the circular one, the area of which has been stated
already. The wall which surrounds this work, is
generally now about ten feet in height, where it
has not been manufactured into brick. There are
seven gateways leading into this fort, besides the
one that communicates with the square fortification;
that is, one at each angle and another in the wall
just half way between the angular ones. Before
each of these gateways was a mound of earth of
four or five feet in height, intended for the defence
of these openings. The extreme care of the
authors
of these works to protect and defend every
part of the circle, is no where visible about this
square fort. The former is defended by two high
walls; the latter by one. The former has a deep
ditch encircling it; this has none. The former could
be entered at one place only; this at eight and
those about twenty feet broad. The present town
of Circleville covers all the round and the western
half of the square fort. These fortifications, where
the town stands, will entirely disappear in a few
years, and I have used the only means within my
power to perpetuate their memory by the annexed
drawing and this brief description. Where the
wall of the square fort has been manufactured into
brick, the workmen found some ashes, calcined
stones, sticks, and a little vegetable mould; all of
which must have been taken up from the surface of
the surrounding plain. As the square fort is a
perfect
square, so the gateways or openings are at equal
distances from each other, and on a right line
parallel
with the wall. The walls of this work vary a
few degrees from north and south, east and west,
but not more than the needle varies, and not a few
surveyors have, from this circumstance, been
impressed
with the belief that the authors of those works
were acquainted with astronomy. What surprised
me on measuring these forts, was the exact manner
in which they had laid down their circle and square;
so that after every effort, by the most careful survey,
to detect some error in their measurement, we
found that it was impossible, and that the
measurement
was much more correct than it would have
been, in all probability, had the present inhabitants
undertaken to construct such work. Let those
consider this circumstance, who affect to believe
that these antiquities were raised by the ancestors
of the present race of Indians. Having learned
something of astronomy, what nation living as our
Indians do, in the open air, with the heavenly
bodies
in full view, could have forgotten such
knowledge
.
Some hasty travellers who have spent an
hour or two here, have concluded that the forts
at Circleville were not raised for military, but for
religious purposes, because there were two
extraordinary
tumuli there. A gentleman in one of our
Atlantic cities, who has never crossed the
Alleghanies
,
has written to me that he is fully convinced
that they were raised for religious purposes. Men
thus situated, and with no correct means of
judging
,
will hardly be convinced by any thing I can
say. Nor do I address myself to them directly
or indirectly; for it has long been my maxim, that
it is worse than vain to spend one's time in
endeavoring
to reason men out of opinions for which
they never had any reasons.
The round fort was picketed in, if we are to
judge from the appearance of the ground on and
and about the walls. Half-way up the outside of
the inner wall, is a place distinctly to be seen, where
a row of pickets once stood, and where it was
placed when this work of defence was originally
erected. Finally, this work about its walls and
ditch, eight years since, presented as much of a
defensive
aspect as forts which were occupied in our
wars with the French in 1755, such as Oswego
Fort, Stanwin, and others. These works have been
examined by the first military men in the United
States, and they have uniformly declared their
opinion to be, that they were military works of
defence
.Pp.
45 to 48.
In Drake's Book of the Indians, (fifth edition)
the reader will find other military remains described:
Further up the little Miami at Deerfield, are
other interesting remains; but those which have
attracted more attention than any others in the
Miami country, are situated six miles from
Lebanon
,
above the mouth of Todd's Fork, an eastern
branch of the Miami. On the summit of a ridge
at least two hundred feet above the valley of the
river, there are two irregular trapezoidal figures,
connected at a point where the ridge is very much
narrowed by a ravine. The wall, which is entirely
of earth, is generally eight or ten feet high; but in
one place, where it is conducted over level ground
for a short distance, it rises to eighteen. Its
situation
is accurately adjusted to the brow of the hill;
and as there is in addition to the Miami on the
west, deep ravines on the north, the south-east and
south, it is a position of great strength. The angles
in this wall, both retreating and salient, are
numerous
and generally acute. The openings, or
gateways
,
are not less than eighty. They are rarely at
equal distances, and are sometimes within two or
three rods of one another. They are not opposite to,
or connected with, any existing artificial objects, or
topographical peculiarities, and present, therefore,
a paradox of some difficulty.Book I. p. 42.
Note (2)Page 9.
That a numerous population once dwelt in the
midst of our western mounds, we are satisfied from
13
every evidence that we are entitled to require.
Their public works, fortifications, walls, and towers,
testify to the labors of a populous nation: but if we
look into their graves, we receive a more emphatic
answer than all their living labors could furnish.
Every hillock in the mighty west is bursting with
the relics of this extinguished race; every plain is
crowded with the pale assemblies of their skeletons,
silently awaiting the only voice that can summon
them to speak of the past.
The particular number mentioned in the text is
derived from Mr. Brackenridge, who conjectured
that there were once five thousand villages of this
people in the valley of the Mississippi. Many of
the mounds contain an immense number of
skeletons
.
Those of Big Grave Creek are believed to
be completely filled with human bones. The large
ones, all along the principal rivers in this state,
(Ohio,) are also filled with skeletons. Millions of
human beings have been buried in these tumuli.
From the Rocky Mountains in the West, to the
Alleghanies in the East, the country must have
been more or less settled by them.
[1]
[1]
Vide Atwater.
Almost every traveller of late years has said
something of the mounds or fortifications scattered
over the south and west, from Florida to the Lakes,
and from the Hudson to Mexico and the Pacific
Ocean. By some they are reckoned at several
thousand. Mr. Brackenridge supposes there may
be three thousand; but it would not outrage
probability
,
I presume, to set them down at twice that
number. Indeed no one can form any just
estimate
in respect to the number of mounds and
fortifications
which have been built, any more than of
the period of time which has passed since they were
originally erected, for several obvious reasons; one
or two of which may be mentioned:the plough,
excavations, and levellings for towns, roads, and
various other works, have entirely destroyed
hundreds
of them, which had never been described, and
whose sites cannot be ascertained. Another great
destruction of them has been effected by the
changing
of the course of rivers.
Drake
, Book I. p. 41.
Note (3)Page 15.
Like many people, those aboriginals, in their
various methods of inhumation, deposited
something
of real or supposed value with the deceased.
Perhaps they always did. The contrary cannot be
asserted, as many of the articles might have been
perishable. This practice assures us of their belief
in a future existence.
Conjectures respecting the
Ancient Inhabitants of North America: by
Moses
Fisk
, Esq., of Hilham, Tennessee.Vol. I. Arch
ologia
American.
Mr. Harris, a member of the Massachusetts'
Historical
Society, gives the following account of the
ancient graves which are scattered over the whole
face of the western country:
The places called
graves
are small mounds of
earth, from some of which human bones have been
taken. In one were found the bones, in their
natural
position, of a man buried nearly east and west,
with a quantity of isinglass (mica membranea) on
his breast. In the others, the bones laid
promiscuously
,
some of them appeared partly burnt and
calcined
by fire, also stones, evidently burnt, charcoal,
arrow-heads, and fragments of a kind of
earthenware
.
An opening being made at the summit of
the great conic mound, there were found the bones
of an adult, in a horizontal position, covered with a
flat stone. Beneath this skeleton were thin stones,
placed vertically, at small and different distances,
but no bones were discovered. That this venerable
monument might not be defaced, the opening was
closed without further search. It is worthy of
remark
,
that the walls and mounds were not thrown
up from ditches, but raised by bringing the earth
from some distance, or taking it up uniformly from
the surface of the plain. The parapets were
probably
made of equal height and breadth, but the waste
of time has rendered them lower and broader in
some parts than others. It is in vain to conjecture
what tools or machinery were employed in the
construction
of these works; but there is no reason to
suppose that any of the implements were of iron.
Plates of copper have been found in some of the
mounds, but they appear to be parts of armor.
Nothing that would answer the purpose of a shovel
has ever been discovered.
Mr. Harris quotes Dr. Cutter upon the probable
antiquity of these mounds. The Doctor conceives
that the only clue remaining is the growth upon
them. He says, one tree, decayed at the centre,
contained at least 463 circles. Its age was
undoubtedly
more than 463 years. Other trees, in a growing
state, were, from their appearance, much older.
There were likewise the strongest marks of a
previous
growth, as large as the present. Admitting
the age of the present growth to be 450 years, and
that it had been preceded by one of equal size and
age, which as probably as otherwise was not the
first, the works have been deserted more than 900
years.
Mr. Harris remarks that about 90 miles from
Marietta, on a large plain, bounded by one of the
western branches of the Muskingum, are a train of
ancient works, nearly two miles in extent, the
ramparts
of which are yet in some places upwards of
18 feet perpendicular height. At Licking are very
extensive works, some of them different in
construction
from those at Marietta; particulary several
circular
forts, with but one entrance. They are formed
of a parapet from 7 to 12 feet in height, without any
ditch; the interior being of the same level with the
plain on which they are raised. Forts of this kind,
which are also found in other places, are from 3
chains to 15 or more in diameter. There are also
large walls and mounds on the Great Miami and
the Scioto.
The original height, our author thinks, was
diminished
by the gradual wasting away of the earth,
and the filling up of the interior, and the accretion
13*
of the soil over the whole surface of the plain, by
the annual deposit of leaves and the decay of
timber
.
The utensils he considers to have belonged
to a people far advanced in the arts.
The elevated squares might be the foundations
of larger towns and arsenals. The excavations or
caves were undoubtedly wells, now filled up, water
being an essential article in a besieged place. Some
of these are above 40 feet in diameter, and about 5
feet in depthhave some resemblance to sacred
enclosures found in Mexico.
The smaller mounds, on the great plains, are
filled with bones, laid in various directions, in an
equal state of decay, and appear to be piled over
heaps of slain, after some great battle. Whereas
the larger mounds, near the fenced cities, are
composed
of strata, if I may so say, of bones in more
regular order, of full-grown people and of infants,
and in different stages of decay, and seem formed
of the bodies of such as have died of sickness, or
were killed in occasional skirmishes, at different
times, with intervals, perhaps, of some years. In
some have been found plates of copper rivetted
together
,
copper beads, various implements of stone,
and a very curious kind of porcelain.
The
Journal
of a Tour into the Territory north-west of the
Alleghany
Mountains, made in
1805
: by
Thaddeus
Mason Harris
, Member of Mass. His. Soc.
Boston
,
1805.
Note (4)Page 16.
The Rev. Robert G. Wilson, a receiving officer
of the American Antiquarian Society, furnished
Mr. Atwater with minute information concerning
a mound, which once stood near the centre of the
town of Chilicothe, Ohio.
Its perpendicular height, at the time of its
demolition
,
was about fifteen feet, and the diameter of
its base about sixty. It was composed of sand, and
contained human bones, belonging to skeletons
which were buried in different parts of it. It was
not until this pile of earth was removed, and the
original surface exposed to view, that a probable
conjecture of its original design could be formed.
About twenty feet square of the surface had been
levelled and covered with bark. On the centre of
this lay a human skeleton, over which had been
spread a mat, manufactured either from weeds or
bark. On the breast lay what had been a piece of
copper, in the form of a cross, which had now
become
verdigris. On the breast also lay a stone
ornament
,
with two perforations, one near each end,
through which passed a string, by means of which
it was suspended round the wearer's neck. On
this string, which was made of sinews, and very
much injured by time, was placed a great many
beads, made of ivory or bone. With these facts
before us, concluded Dr. Wilson, we are left to
conjecture at what time this individual lived; what
were his heroic achievements in the field of battle;
his wisdom and eloquence in the councils of his
nation. But his contemporaries have testified, in a
manner not to be mistaken, that among them he was
held in grateful remembrance.
Note (5)Page 16.
On the beach near the mouth of the Muskingum,
was discovered a curious ornament. It is made of
white marble, in form a circle about three inches in
diameter. The outer edge is about one inch in
thickness, with a narrow rim. The sides are deeply
concave, and in the centre is a hole about half an
inch in diameter. It is beautifully finished, and so
smooth that Dr. Hildreth is of the opinion that it
was once highly polished. It is now in the
possession
of David Putnam, Esq., of Marietta, Ohio.
Other articles, similar to this, have been found in
several mounds in many places. The use to which
the one described was put, cannot certainly be
known. Was it a rude wind instrument of music?
or was it a badge of office and distinction?
Atwater
.Pp.
131, 132.
With regard to the pleasure gardens, which are
alluded to more than once in the text, I may as well
quote here a passage from the 26th volume of the
N. A. Review; at the same time taking the liberty
to differ entirely from the remarks of the writer as
to the barbarous character of other ancient
memorials
found throughout the West: In some cursory
remarks upon the large mounds in the vicinity of St.
Louis, Mr. Schoolcraft justly observes, that `enough
has certainly been written on the subject of our
mounds to prove how little we know either of their
origin or of their interior structure.' These remains
of ancient art have attracted the attention of
travellers
since the first settlement of the country; and
standing as they do, the sole monuments of human
industry, amid interminable forests, it is not
surprising
that curiosity should be busy in investigating
the age and objects of their founders. But little has
been effected, however, to satisfy the rational
inquirer
;
and before much progress can be made, all
the facts connected with the topographical situation
and construction of these works, and with the
remains
of earthen and metallic instruments found in
and about them, should be collected and preserved.
The Rev. Isaac McCoy, the Principal of the
Missionary
establishment upon the St. Joseph of Lake
Michigan, a man of sound judgment and rigid
integrity
,
has observed a class of works in that
country
,
differing essentially from any which have been
elsewhere found. As his account of them is
interesting
,
we shall transcribe the letter he has
addressed
to us.
`Aware of the interest you feel in every thing
relating
to the character and condition of the
aborigines
of our country, I do myself the pleasure to
enclose
to you a plot of a tract of land which has been
cultivated in an unusual manner for this country,
and which was abandoned by its cultivators ages
ago. These marks of antiquity are peculiarly
interesting
because they exhibit the work of civilized
and not of savage man. All, or nearly all the other
works of antiquity, which have been found in these
western regions, convince the observer that they
were found by men who had made little or no
advance
in the arts. If we examine a number of
mounds in the same neighborhood, we find them
situated without any regard to order in the
arrangement
,
precisely as modern savages place the huts in
their villages and plant the corn in their field. If we
observe a fortification made of earth, we shall find
it exhibits no greater order in its formation, than
necessity in a similar case would suggest to an
uncultivated
Indian of modern days. If it be a
wall of stone, the stones are unbroken as they were
taken from the quarry, or rather from the neighboring
brook or river. In the works, to which I now allude,
we find what we suppose to be garden spots, thrown
into ridges and walks with so much judgment, good
order, and taste in the arrangement, as to forbid a
thought that they were formed by uncivilized man.
The plans sent you by no means represent the most
striking works. I procured them because the places
were near my residence. I can find several acres
together, laid out into walks and beds in a style
which would not suffer by comparison with any
gardens in the United States. These places were
not cultivated by the early French emigrants to the
country, because1. They evince a population at
least twenty times greater than the French ever had
in any of the regions of the lakes in those early times.
In the tract of country in which I have observed
them, of one hundred and fifty miles in extent, north
and south, from Grand River to the Elksheart, I
think the number and extent of these ancient
improvements
indicate a population nearly or quite
equal to that of Indiana. 2. The early French
establishments
were generally made on navigable
streams. But these improvements are spread over
the whole country. Scarcely a fertile prairie is
found on the margin of which we do not observe
these evidences of civilization. 3. These works were
abandoned by their proprietors long before the
country became known to the Europeans. The
timber standing, falling and decaying, on these
cultivated
spots, has precisely the same appearance in
respect to age as that immediately adjoining. On a
cluster of these beds, a plan of which I send you, I
cut down a white oak tree which measured three
feet two inches in diamater, two and a half feet above
the ground, and which was three hundred and
twenty-five years old, if the real age of a tree is
indicated
by the number of its concentric circles.
From the indications yet remaining, it is certain that
most of these works have disappeared. We find
none in the beech, ash or walnut land, because here
the earth is loose and mellow to the surface, and not
bound with grass. We find them rarely in the
prairies
far from the timber, because the places of which
I speak have been, as I suppose, not fields but
gardens
convenient to dwelling-houses, which were
probably placed in the vicinity of the timber for the
same reasons which induce our present settlers to
select similar sites for their residence. In what we
call barrens, adjoining prairies, the surface of the
earth is bound by the grass, in the same manner as
that of the prairie itself, and by that means the
ridges are preserved. And notwithstanding the
causes which are in daily operation to destroy these
works, I am confident I have seen acres of them
which will last for centuries, if assailed by no other
hand than that of nature. The Indians of Grand
River informed me that these appearances are found
on all the waters of that river, and that they extend
south upon all the waters of the Kekalimazoo. A
few are found near Michillimackinac. To use their
expression, the country is full of them. The Indian
tradition on this subject, is, that these places were
cultivated by a race of men, whom they denominate
Prairie Indians, and that they were driven from the
country by the united tribes of Chippewas, Ottawas,
and Pottawatomies. The few who survived the
calamities of war, went westward, and some may
even yet exist beyond the Mississippi. But not the
smallest reliance can be placed on any Indian
tradition
relating to a remote period.'
Note (6)Page 29.
A single passage illustrative of the character of
this departed people, may be worth extracting from
an article in Silliman's Journal for 1834, entitled,
Ten Days in Ohio, from the Diary of a
Naturalist
.
Speaking of Circleville and its ancient works, he
says, a street has been opened across the little
mound which covered the hill, and in removing the
earth many skeletons were found in good
preservation
.
A cranium of one of these was in my
possession
,
and is a noble specimen of the race which
once occupied these ancient walls. It has a high
forehead and large bold features, with all the
phrenological
marks of daring and bravery.
Considerable discussion has arisen as to the size
of the builders of the mounds; some contending
that they were a nation of giants, while others as
strenuously argue that they were a race of dwarfs.
In this dilemma I have chosen to adopt a middle
course and to represent them as
mere men
. To
enlighten
the reader, however, as to the state of the
question, the following extracts are furnished, the
first from Timothy Flint's able work,
Recollections
of the Valley of the Mississippi.
The more the subject of the past races of men
and animals in this region is investigated, the more
perplexed it seems to become. The huge bones of
the animals indicate them to be vastly larger than
any that now exist on the earth. All that I have
seen and heard of the remains of the men would
seem to show that they were smaller than the men
of our times. All the bodies that have been found
in that state of high preservation, in which they
were discovered in nitrous caves, were
considerably
smaller than the present ordinary stature of
men. The two bodies that were found in the vast
limestone cavern in Tennessee, one of which I
saw at Lexington, were neither of them more than
14
four feet in height. It seemed to me that this must
have been nearly the height of the living person.
The teeth and nails did not seem to indicate the
shrinking of the flesh from them in the desicating
process by which they were preserved. The teeth
were separated by considerable intervals, and were
small, long, white and short, reviving the horrible
images of nursery tales of ogres' teeth. The hair
seemed to have been sandy or inclining to yellow.
It is well known that nothing is so uniform in the
present Indian as his long black hair. From the
pains taken to preserve the bodies, and the great
labor of making the funeral robes in which they
were folded, they must have been of the blood
royal, or personages of great consideration in their
day. The person that I saw had evidently died by
a blow on the skull. The blood had coagulated
there into a mass of texture and color sufficiently
marked to show that it had been blood. The
envelope
of the body was double. Two splendid
blankets completely woven with the most beautiful
feathers of the wild turkey arranged in regular
stripes and compartments encircled it. The cloth
on which these feathers were woven, was a kind of
linen of neat texture, of the same kind with that
which is now woven from the fibres of the nettle.
The body was evidently that of a female of middle
age, and I should suppose that her majesty weighed
when I saw her six or eight pounds.At the time
that the Lilliputian graves were found on the
Maumee
in the county of St. Louis, many people went
from that town to satisfy their curiosity by
inspecting
them. I made arrangements to go, but was
called away by indispensable duties. I relate them
from memory only, and from the narrative oral and
printed of the Rev. Mr. Peck, who examined them
on the spot. It appears from him that the graves
were numerous, that the coffins were of stone, that
the bones in some instances were nearly entire;
that the length of the bodies was determined by
that of the coffins which they filled, and that the
bodies in general could not have been more than
from three feet and a half to four feet in length.
Thus it should seem that the generations of the past
in this region were mammoths and pigmies.
In Travels in America, performed in 1806, for the
purpose of exploring the Rivers Alleghany,
Monongahela
,
Ohio, and Mississippi, and ascertaining the
produce and condition of their banks and vicinity,
by Thomas Ashe,the reader will find the opposite
opinion, with many other curious matters, set forth.
The author, after describing with great particularity
his labors near Fort Harmer in Ohio, says, I came
to a substance, which on the most critical examination
I judged to be a mat or mats in a state of entire
decomposition
and decay. I took up the impalpable
powder in my hands and fanned off the remaining
dust with my hat. There existed under my feet a
beautiful tasselated pavement of small colored stones;
the color and stones arranged in such a manner as to
express harmony and shades, and to portray the full
length figure of a warrior under whose feet a
snake was exhibited in ample folds. No part of
the pavement was exactly of the tasselate character
except the space between the outline of the figures
and the sides and ends of the entire space. Little
more than the actual pavement could be preserved;
it is composed of flat stones one inch deep, two
inches square, and the prevailing colors are white,
green, dark blue and pale spotted red; all of which
are peculiar to the lakes, and are not to be had
nearer. They are evidently known and filled with
a precision which proves them to have been but from
one common example. The whole was affixed
with a thin layer of sand which covered a large
piece of beech bark in great decay, whose removal
exposed what I was fully prepared to discover
from all the previous indications, the remains of a
human skeleton of uncommon magnitude extended
in a bark shell, which also contained, 1st. An
earthen
urn or rather pot of earthen ware, in which were
several small broken bones and some white
sediment
.
The urn appears to be made of sand and
flint vitrified, rings like a rummer glass, holds about
two gallons, has a top or cover of the same material,
resists fire as completely as iron or brass; 2d. A
stone hatchet with a groove round the pole, by which
it was fastened with a withe to the handle; 3d.
Twenty-four arrow points made of flint and bone,
and lying in a position which betrayed their having
belonged to a quiver; 4th. A quantity of beads,
round, oval, and square; colored green, black,
white, blue and yellow; 5th. A conch shell
decomposed
into a substance like chalk. This shell is
fourteen inches long and twenty-three in
circumference
;
6th. Under a heap of dust and tumous
shreds of feathered cloth and hair, a parcel of brass
rings cut by an art unknown to me, out of a solid
piece of that metal, and in such a manner that the
rings are suspended from each other without the
aid of solder or any visible agency whatever.
Of the skeleton I have preserved a small part of
the vertebral column, a portion of the skull, a part
of the under jaw, &c.
Judging from comparison and analogy, the being
to whom these remains belonged, could not have
been less than seven feet high. That he was a
king, sachem, or chief of a very remote period,
there can be no manner of doubt.
Note (7)Page 33.
A letter from Dr. S. P. Hildreth, dated July 19,
1819, gives some account of the opening of a
tumulus
at Marietta, and the various remains of antiquity
which it contained.
In removing the earth which composed an
ancient
mound in one of the streets of Marietta, on
the margin of the plain, near the fortifications,
several curious articles were discovered, the latter
part of June last. They appear to have been buried
with the body of the person to whose memory this
mound was erected. Lying immediately over, or on
the forehead of the body, were found three large
circular
bosses, or ornaments for a sword-belt or a
buckler
;
they are composed of copper, overlaid with a thick
14*
plate of silver. The fronts of them are slightly
convex
,
with a depression like a cup in the centre, and
measure two inches and a quarter across the face of
each. On the back side, opposite the depressed
portion, is a copper rivet or nail, around which are
two separate plates by which they were fastened to
the leather. Two small pieces of the leather were
found lying between the plates of one of the bosses;
they resemble the skin of an old mummy, and seem
to have been preserved by the salts of the copper.
The plates of copper are nearly reduced to an
oxyde or rust. The silver looks quite black, but is
not much corroded, and on rubbing it becomes quite
brilliant. Two of these are yet entire: the third
one is so much wasted, that it dropped in pieces on
removing it from the earth. Around the rivet of
one of them is a small quantity of flax or hemp, in
a tolerable state of preservation. Near the side of
the body was found a plate of silver, which appears
to have been the upper part of a sword scabbard;
it is six inches in length and two inches in breadth,
and weighs one ounce; it has no ornaments or
figures, but has three longitudinal ridges, which
probably correspond with edges or ridges of the
sword: it seems to have been fastened to the
scabbard
by three or four rivets, the holes of which yet
remain in the silver. Two or three broken pieces
of a copper tube were also found, filled with iron
rust. These pieces, from their appearance,
composed
the lower end of the scabbard, near the point
of the sword. No sign of the sword itself was
discovered, except the appearance of rust above
mentioned.
A second communication from the same
gentleman
,
to the President of the American Antiquarian
Society, will furnish evidence as to the armor and
weapons mentioned in the text:
In addition to the articles found at Marietta,
I have procured, from a mound on the Little
Muskingum
,
about four miles from Marietta, some pieces
of copper, which appear to have been the front part
of a helmet. It was originally about eight inches
long and four broad, and has marks of having been
attached to leather; it is much decayed, and is now
a thin plate....... I have been told by an eye
witness, that a few years ago, near Blacksburgh, in
Virginia, eighty miles from Marietta, there was
found about half of a steel bow, which, when entire,
would measure five or six feet; the other part was
corroded or broken. The father of the man who
found it was a blacksmith, and worked up this
curious
relic, I suppose, with as little remorse as he
would an old gun barrel.
Note (8)Page 40.
The author has taken the liberty of transferring
an Indian tradition to the credit of their
predecessors
,
the Mound-builders. From what source this
tradition, recited below, was derived; whether it
was the creation purely of a wild and barbarous
imagination, or whether it came into their possession
from some contact with the Mound-building race,
the links of which are now entirely lost, are
questions
that have passed beyond answer from
philosophy
or conjecture.
Some of the Upper Crees, a tribe who inhabit
the country in the vicinity of the Athabasca river,
have a curious tradition with respect to animals
which they state formerly frequented the mountains.
They allege that these animals were of frightful
magnitude, being from two to three hundred feet in
length, and high in proportion; that they formerly
lived in the plains a great distance to the eastward;
from which they were gradually driven by the
Indians
to the Rocky Mountains; that they destroyed
all smaller animals; and if their agility was equal
to their size, would have also destroyed all the
natives
,
&c. One man has asserted that his
grandfather
told him he saw one of those animals in a
mountain pass, where he was hunting, and that on
hearing its roar, which he compared to loud
thunder
,
the sight almost left his eyes, and his heart
became
as small as an infant's.
Adventures on the
Columbia River:
by Ross Cox.
Jefferson, in his Notes on Virginia, has also
attributed a similar legend to the Delawares:
During the Revolution, a delegation of warriors
from the Delaware tribe, told the governor of
Virginia
that it was a tradition handed down from their
fathers, that in ancient times a herd of these
tremendous
animals came to Big-Bone Licks, and
began an universal destruction of the bear, deer,
elk, buffaloes, and other animals, which had been
created for the use of the Indians; that the Great
Man above, looking down and seeing this, was so
enraged that he seized his lightning, descended on
the earth, seated himself on a neighboring mountain,
on a rock, of which his seat and the print of his
feet are still to be seen, and hurled his bolts among
them, till the whole were slaughtered except the
big bull, who, presenting his forehead to the shafts,
shook them off as they fell, but missing one, at
length, it wounded him in the side; whereon,
springing round, he bounded over the Ohio, over
the Wabash, the Illinois, and finally over the great
lakes, where he is living at this day.
NOTES TO PART SECOND.
Note (1)Page 100.
Should
any unlucky doubt disturb the reader's
belief in the incident of Bokulla and the hawk, he is
referred to the 8th chapter of Ross Cox's
Adventures
on the Columbia River. The following should
properly have been introduced as a note to page 81.
The most curious work that has appeared since
Burton's
Anatomie of Melancholy is, I suspect,
American
Antiquities and Discoveries in the West, by
Josiah
Priest. It is an entire eagle's flight beyond any
tract, pamphlet or octavo, that has ever hovered
over the mounds and memorials of the Far West.
The book is in truth a perfect fac simile of the West
itself, where a thigh-bone nudges a piece of
pottery
;
a mummy stands sentinel over a rusty piece of
copper; and a whole range of robust fortifications
is laid deep and piled high to defendnothing!
If there is any single topic of which this book does
not treat, we are so unfortunate as not to have
formed
an acquaintance with the subject or science to
which it belongs. Nothing is beyond the reach
of Mr. Priest's liberal and comprehensive
sympathies
:
He starts by establishing the location of
Mount Ararat, and indulging in sundry shrewd and
piercing conjectures as to the signification of Shem,
Ham and Japhet; the tumultuous times of Noah's
grandson, Peleg, then come in for a share of
comment
,
and the ten lost tribeswhat book, treating
of America, could be perfect without the genealogy
of these vagrant Jewish gentlemen?next put in
an appearance. Then follow chapters on Welch
discoveries, huge Mexican mounds, the state of
antediluvian scholarship, on draining, cannibalism,
and the Lord knows what else!all rushing
together
,
without order or guidance, like a drove of
unhaltered mules. To do Mr. Priest justice,
however, (and every man who labors in the great
field of the West is entitled to some portion of
honor
)
he has accumulated in this book a large amount
of very curious information. He, for instance,
introduces
a story like the following:
During the last year, 1832, a Mr. Ferguson
communicated to the editor of the Christian
Advocate
and Journal, a discovery, which he examined
and described as follows: `On a mountain, called
the Lookout Mountain, belonging to the vast
Alleghanian
chain, running between the Tennessee and
Coos rivers, rising about one thousand feet above
the level of the surrounding valley. The top of the
mountain is mostly level, but presents to the eye an
almost barren waste. On this range,
notwithstanding
its height, a river has its source, which, after
traversing for about seventy miles, plunges over a
precipice. The rock, from which the water falls, is
circular, and juts over considerably. Immediately
below the fall, on each side of the river, are bluffs,
which rise two hundred feet. Around one of these
bluffs the river makes a bend, which gives it the form
of a peninsula. On the top of this are the remains
of what is esteemed fortifications, which consist of a
stone wall built on the very brow of this tremendous
ledge. The whole length of the wall, following the
varying courses of the brink of this precipice, is
thirty-seven rods and eight feet, including about two
acres of ground.' The only descent from this place
is between two rocks, for about thirty feet, when
a bench of the ledge presents itself, from two to five
feet in width, and ninety feet long. This bench is
the only road or path up from the water's edge to
the summit. But just at the foot of the two rocks,
where they reach this path, and within thirty feet of
the top of the rock, are five rooms, which have been
formed by dint of labor. The entrance to these
rooms is very small, but when within, they are found
to communicate with each other, by doors or
apertures
.
Mr. Ferguson thinks them to have been
constructed
during some dreadful war, and those who
constructed them to have acted on the defensive;
and believes that
twenty
men could have withstood
the whole army of Xerxes, as it was impossible for
more than one to pass at a time; and might by the
slightest push be hurled at least a hundred and fifty
feet down the rocks. The reader,' concludes Mr.
Priest, `can indulge his own conjectures, whether
in the construction of this inaccessible fortress, he
does not perceive the remnant of a tribe or nation,
acquainted with the arts of excavation and defence;
making a last struggle against the invasion of an
overwhelming foe; where it is likely they were
reduced
by famine, and perished amid the yells of their
enemies.Pp. 176, 177.
While on the subject of these ancient
fortifications
again, I may as well quote an additional
authority
:
A Journal through the Western
Country
in the summer of 1816, by David Thomas:
Auburn
,
1819. In describing the celebrated remains
at Cirrcleville,, Mr. Thomas says, (p. 94,) I have
noticed
the circular enclosure which has shaped the
town. There is also a square enclosure that touches
it on the east. But though these are stated to be
equal in area, the difference of figure is not greater
than the mode of construction. The circle is
formed
of two banks which are separated by a ditch or
fosse, about 30 feet wide at the natural surface of
the ground, but 60 feet from the top of one bank to
the other. Much of the fosse doubtless has been
filled from the banks in the lapse of ages, but even at
this day a great excavation is visible. The square
on the reverse has no ditch. The bank is about 30
feet wide at the base, 12 feet high, and sufficiently
broad on the summit for a wagon road. It is a
stupebdous
work, and yet the whole mass appears to
have been
carried
hither from a distance. This is
evident in respect to the north and south sides,
which are formed of clay resting on a gravelly sod;
and near the west bank, which is composed of the
15
latter material, I saw no excavation from which it
could have been taken. Near the north-west
corner
a swale or draught for water in heavy rains
appears
both on the inside and outside of the wall, and
proves that it could not have been gathered from the
adjacent surface of the ground. It is a great
singularity
that these materials should have been kept
separate and distinct. At the corners each kind
terminates; and the inner bank of the circular fort
is clay, but the outer is gravel. Doubtless the
latter
was thrown from the ditch, and a stratum of clay
may
have supplied the other; but it is questionable
whether the excavation yielded earth sufficient for
both banks. Our author remarks, that if, as is
probable
,
these fortifications were high enough to guard
the entrance from missile weapons, a great
depression
must have taken place. He states that the area
enclosed was variously estimated from 5 to 19 acres.
The east and west sides of the square, being 17
to the right of the meridian. Hence, some suppose
that they were acquainted with the polarity of the
magnet; that by it the square was drawn, and that
the time can be calculated by its variation. The
small quantities of iron found in the mounds
evinces
that this people were not acquainted with its
manufacture. No glass or substance like it has been
found. The magnetic period, if calculated at 1000
years, which is twice as great as is probable, would
not give the result within one such period. This
mound when discovered was overshadowed with a
forest. Considerable of the north and south walls
has been converted into brick. In a note to the
passage, of which the substance has been above
given, Mr. Thomas discusses the vexed question of
the original peopling of this country at great length
and with much ability. He states that the
comparative
size of various remains is not, as Dr. Drake
supposes, an index to their origin, for many of
these fortifications were destroyed in their
progressive
state. He combats the opinion of Atwater, that
the Mound-builders first settled, subsequently to the
Indians, in the North; that the latter settled in the
Atlantic coast, and that the Mound-builders, on their
emigration thither, were so pressed by the Indians
that they followed the water courses to the south,
and thence migrated to Mexico and Peru. He
thinks the assertion of Dr. Drake, that the mounds
decrease in size, beauty and regularity, in a ratio
corresponding directly to the distance from Mexico,
and that the fact that the peccary, (the Mexican
hog), an animal only known there, has been found
in a cave in Kentucky, is evidence that a Mexican
colony inhabited Ohio and the West. The
fortifications
at Circleville and at other places, evince a
population not only too numerous to be supplied
with food from the forest, but too laborious to be
engaged in such uncertain pursuits, and on what
did they subsist becomes the question. Nothing of
this part of their story is known. None of our
indigenous
vegetables, seem well adapted to supply
their wants; and as the regions, which they
inhabited
,
were all favorable to the production of the
Indian
corn, it is no improbable conjecture that this
grain was their staff of life.
Persons disposed to visit ancient fortifications
may find remains at the following places:
1. About two miles southeasterly from Aurora, a
triangular area of one or two acres is protected on
two sides by precipitous banks, and on the other by
two ditches. Bones of animals and fragments of
ancient earthenware are found in beds of ashes.
2. On the hill south of Auburn,also a circular
ditch enclosing about two acres, one and a quarter
miles N. N. E. of Auburn. The only opening or
gateway appears in the side adjasent to a spring,
and is formed by extending one end of the ditch
beyond the other. This simple contrivance
rendered
such mounds as those of Circleville unnecessary.
No vestige of iron has been discovered, although
fragments of earthenware are numerous.
3. On the west of the Seneca River, N. W. from
Montezuma. On the east shore near this village a
small mound appears.
4. We also learn that considerable fortifications
are visible near Black River, between Brownsville
and Le Roy.
Note (2)p. 118.
I am not sure that I can conclude the notes on the
Mastodon better than by furnishing the reader a
summary of information relating to that vast
creature
,
made up of facts and discoveries, as well as
tradition and conjecture, partly gathered from a
valuable note to De Witt Clinton's Discourse
before
the Lit. and Phil. Society of this city, and
partly
prepared from other sources.
The traditions of the Indians, says Clinton
in the authority alluded to, which is a dissertation
rather than a note, and the speculations of
philosophers
respecting this enormous animal have been
various, and, perhaps on the whole, unsatisfactory.
It is certain that the Indians had some notions
respecting
the mammoth, which they might have
derived
from tradition, or, after seeing its remains,
they might have invented the fables which exist.
Charlevois, in his voyage to North America, (vol. I.),
says, `There is also a very diverting tradition
among the Indians, of a great elk of such monstrous
size that the rest are like pismires in comparison
of him; his legs, they say, are so long that eight feet
of snow are not the least encumbrance to him; his
hide is proof against all manner of weapons, and he
has a sort of arm proceeding from his shoulder, which
he uses as we do ours. He is always attended by
a vast number of elks, which form his court, and
which render him all the services he requires.' This
description, respecting the arm, appears like the
proboscis of an elephant. Kalm, who travelled in
this country in 1749, says, `some years ago a
skeleton
of an amazing great animal has been found in
that part of Canada where the Illinois live on the
river Ohio. The Indians were surprised at the sight
of it; and when they were asked what they thought
it was, they answered that it must be the chief or
father of all the beavers. It was of a prodigious
bulk, and had thick white teeth about 10 inches
15*
long. It was looked upon as the skeleton of an
elephant. A French lieutenant in the fort, who had
seen it, assured me that the figure of the whole snout
was yet to be seen, though it was half mouldered.
He added, that he had not observed that any of the
bones were taken away, but thought the skeleton lay
quite perfect there. I have heard people talk of
this monstrous skeleton in several other parts of
Canada.'
Kalm's Travels
, vol. 3.
In the 20th volume of Silliman's Journal will be
found a Report of Messrs. Cooper, J. A. Smith and
De Kay, to the Lyceum of Nat. History, on a
collection
of fossil bones, discovered at Big Bone Lick,
Kentucky, in September, 1830, and recently brought
to New-York. The report is followed with remarks
by the editor, which corroborate certain suggestions
in the First Part of this work. Having (since
the above account was received) seen the collection
of bones so accurately described above, I cannot
refrain
from attempting to convey to others something
of the impression made upon my own mind, on
entering
the room containing this astonishing
assemblage
of bones, many of which are of gigantic size.
They produce in the beholder the conviction that
races
of animals formerly existed on this continent, not
only of vast magnitude, but which must also have been
very numerous;
and the Mastodon, at least, ranged in
herds over probably the entire American continent
. It
is stated by the person who exhibits this collection,
that the skull and the tusks which it contains, weigh
upwards of five hundred pounds; that a pair of
tusks now lying in the room and supposed to
belong
to the same species, weighed six hundred
pounds when taken from the ground; and these are
nearly perfect; and when we regard them as being
merely appendages, and sustained by the animal at
a great mechanical disadvantage, since they do not
like horns rest upon the head, but project from it
laterally forward, we can easily imagine that it would
require the most powerful muscles to sustain and
wield the entire cranium tusks, muscles and
integuments
.
We shall be happy to see additional
illustrations
from the able committee to whom we are
indebted
for the previous statement of facts. We will,
however, venture to mention the extraordinary
curvature
of the tusks: those of the elephant we believe
are always in the form of a bent bow, but these have
almost the shape of a sickle, with the blade curved to
one side; they are sharp and pointed.
In the year 1748, M. Fabri, who had made great
excursions into the northern parts of Louisiana and
the southern regions of Canada, informed Buffon
that he had seen heads and skeletons of enormous
quadrupeds, called by the savages the father of oxen;
and that the thigh bones of the animals were from 5
to 6 feet in length.
Buffon's Nat. Hist., transl. by
Smellie
, vol. 9.
In Siberia a similar animal was supposed to exist
under ground, and many fables were related
respecting
it, under the Russian name of mammoth.
Notwithstanding
these traditions and reports, the
attention
of the philosophers of Europe was not fully
drawn to this subject until 1765, when Mr. George
Croghan saw, in the vicinity of a large salt marsh, on
the country bordering on the Ohio, immense bones
and teeth, and he sent some of them to England,
where they immediately became the subject of
speculation
and discussion. Before this similar bones were
discovered in the Russian dominions. Dr. Hunter,
the celebrated anatomist, from an examination of the
teeth, pronounced them to belong to a carnivorous
nondescript animal. Daubenton declared at one
time that this animal was an elephant; and at
another
time thought that the teeth were those of an
hippopotamus, and conceived that the animal
partook
of both of these species, and was a real mule.
Muller supposed that they belonged to certain
unknown
quadrupeds, denominated maumouts, or
mammoths from the Russian name, supposed to have
been derived from the Hebrew, Behemoth. Buffon
was of opinion, that, independently of the elephant
and hippopotamus, whose relics are equally found
in the two continents, another animal, common to
both, has formerly existed, the size of which has
greatly exceeded that of the largest elephants; and
at one period he supposed that it was seven times
larger. Pallas believed that the bones found in
Siberia
were those of the elephant and rhinoceros, and
said that those countries, which are now desolated
by the rigors of intense cold, have formerly enjoyed
all the advantages of the southern latitudes.
Gmelin
supposes that vast inundations in the south had
driven the elephants to the north, where they would
all at once perish by the rigor of the climate. Others
are of opinion that the tusk and skeleton belonged
to the elephant, and the molares to the
hippopotamus
;
as the grinders were not those of the former,
some thought that they were the bones of the
hippopotamus
only; others of a monster of the ocean.
And the Abbe Clavigero says, that they may from
what appears have belonged to giants of the human
as well as of any other race. Jefferson asserts that
the skeleton of the mammoth bespeaks an animal of
five or six times the cubic volume of the elephant,
and that the grinders are five times as largeare
square, and the grinding surfaces studded with four
or five rows of blunt points; whereas, those of the
elephant are broad and thin, and their grinding
surface
flat. To mention all the hypotheses and fables
which this subject has produced, would be useless
and consume too much time; but two or three
more are worth stating, on account of their
whimsical
absurdity. One writer says, that the bones in
question are the remains of certain angelic beings,
the original tenants of this our terrestrial globe, in
its primitive state, till, for their transgressions, both
were involved in ruin; after which this shattered
planet was refitted for its present inhabitants.
Another imagines that at some remote period the
places in which these bones were found might
have laid in the track of a conqueror unknown to
the historians of Europe; that it might have been
the scene of a battle, and the animals in question
part of the baggage train destroyed by slaughter or
disease, and left, in the hurry of flight, to puzzle and
set at defiance generations yet unborn.
Within a few years a better opportunity has been
afforded of forming just conclusions respecting this
animal. Within the extent of a few miles five or
ten skeletons have been discovered at the bottom of
marl pits in Orange and Ulster counties, and (from
the calcareous nature of the substance in which they
were deposited) in a high state of preservation. One
of these skeletons has been mounted and placed in
its natural form and with almost all the bones in
Peale's Museum in Philadelphia.
In 1799, upon the shores of the Frozen ocean,
near the mouth of the river Lena, in Siberia, a
Tongouse
chief discovered in the midst of a rock of ice,
a substance which did not resemble the floating
pieces of wood usually found there; he endeavored
in vain to ascertain what it was at that time. About
the close of the second summer enabled him to know
that it was a mammoth; but he could not succeed
in obtaining the tusks of the animal until the end of
the fifth year, when the ice, which enclosed it,
having
partly melted, the level became sloped, and this
enormous mass, pushed forward by its own weight, fell
over upon its side on a sand bank. In March, 1804,
the Chief Schoumachoff obtained the tusks and sold
them for fifty roubles. In the summer of 1806,
Michael
Adams, a member of the Academy of St.
Petersburgh
,
visited the mammoth in company with
the chief, and found it in a very mutilated state.
The proprietor was content with the profits he had
already derived from it, and the jakouts of the
neighborhood tore off the flesh with which they fed
their dogs. Ferocious animals, white bears of the
north pole, gluttons, wolves, and foxes preyed upon
it also, and their burrows were seen in the
neighborhood
.
The skeleton, almost completely unfleshed,
was entire, with the exception of one of the
forefeet
.
The spindyle from the head to the os coccygis,
a shoulder blade, the pelvis, and the remains of the
three extremities were still tightly attached by the
ligaments of the joints and by strips of skin on the
exterior side of the carcass. The head was covered
with a dry skin; one of the ears, well preserved, was
furnished with a tuft of bristles. The eyes were
also preserved, and the ball of the left eye could be
distinguished. The tip of the under lip had been
eaten away, and the upper part being destroyed
exhibited
the teeth. The brain was still in the
cranium
,
but it appeared dry. The parts least damaged
were a forefoot and a hind one covered with skin
and having the sole attached.See an account
of a Journey to the Frozen seas, and the
discovery
of the remains of a mammoth, by Michael
Adams, of St. Petersburgh, in the 29th vol. of
Tillock's Philosophical Magazine, and Cuvier's
Essay on the Theory of Earth, transl. by Jameson.
The mammoth of New-York, although bearing
some general resemblance to the elephant, differs
from it in the general figure; in the tusks,
formation
of the head, prominence and pointedness of the
back over the shoulders, its great descent thence
from the hips, together with the comparative
smallness
of the body; there are proofs of greater
activity
also in the structure of the thigh-bones and
the formation of the ribs, which are peculiar and
indicative
of greater strength; it also differs in the
magnitude of the spines of the back; the
proportionate
length of the processes from the spine of the
scapula; the thickness and strength of all the bones,
particularly of the limbs; the teeth, which are of
the carnivorous kind; its under jaw, which is
distinctly
angular, instead of being semi-circular, as in
the elephant, besides several other striking
distinctions
.
There can be little doubt but that it is at
least specifically distinct from the elephant.
Philosophical
Magazine, Peale's account
, vol. 14.
From the size of the head, the thickness and
solidity of the teeth, and the enormous magnitude
of the tusks, we can at once perceive that the neck
of the animal must of necessity have been short, in
order to sustain so great a weight. These
circumstances
,
considered in connection with the length of
the limbs presently to be described, clearly indicates
that the Mastodon, like the Elephant, had a long and
flexible trunk for the purpose of conveying its
aliment
to the mouth; the shortness of the neck and
the projection and curvature of the tusks, would
equally have prevented the approach of the mouth
to the ground.
Godman's Nat. Hist.
The examination of the Asiatic Mammoth has
also settled the question as to its identity with the
American. They are considered as specifically if
not generically different. Blumenbach has termed
the Asiatic mammoth, elephas primaevus or
primogenus
,
and the American mammoth the elephas
Americanus. Cavier calls it the mastodontus,
which name has been adopted by Dr. Barton. In
the memoirs of the National Institute, Cuvier
describes
the former, elephas mammonteus, maxilla
obtusiore, lamellis molarium tenuibus rectis; and
the latter he characterizes as follows: Elephas
Americanus, molaribus multi-cuspidibus, lamellis
post detritionem quadrilobatis. In his opinion,
neither of them are the same as the existing
elephant
,
and he considers them as extinct.
Sciences
Phys. et Mat. II.
.
Dr. Barton, of Philadelphia, is of opinion that the
animal described by Adams, although different from
the Ohio animal, has a great and striking affinity to
it. He believes there is a much greater affinity
between
the Asiatic mammoth and the existing Asiatic
elephant, than between either of them and the Ohio
or American mammoth; yet there are several other
characters in which the resemblance is much closer
between the Ohio animal and the Asiatic mammoth,
than between the latter and the Asiatic elephant,
and that one of these characters consists in the great
resemblance of the incisores, tusks or horns. Dr.
Barton is further of opinion that the Asiatic
mammoth
has been discovered in different parts of the
United States, and that a branch of the
Susquehannah
receives its name of Chemung from the incisores
of one of these animals.
Port Folio
, vol. 4,
Barton's
letter to Jefferson
.
Governor Pownall, in a paper published in the
Philosophical Magazine, vol. 14, after having
viewed
the skeleton of the New-York mammoth,
exhibited
by Mr. Peale in London, is of opinion that it
was a marine animal from the following
circumstances
:
1. Its being carnivorous, and its enormous bulk
16
would therefore require a supply of animal food
from the earth which it could not get, and which
could only be found in the abundance of the waters.
2. He thinks there are parts in the debris of the
skull which have some comparative resemblance to
the whale as to the purpose of breathing under
water
;
that the width of the jaws is similar to that of
fish; and that the ribs more similar to those of fish
than to those of terrestrial animals, are, by their
construction
and position, ordained to resist a more
forcible external compression than the atmosphere
creates.
3. That the neck is so short that the animal could
not reach the ground with its mouth, the line from
the withers to the end of the under jaw being about
one third of the line from the withers to the ground.
Mr. Peale says that there are many reasons to
suppose that he was of an amphibious nature, and is
decidedly of opinion that he lived entirely on flesh
or fish.
While some may be willing to concur with
Mr. Peale as to its amphibious nature, few will
agree with Pownall in its being an aquatic animal.
The shortness of its neck might have been supplied
by a trunk. The points, wherein it resembles in its
formation certain fish, are only indicative of
amazing
strength; and there is no strong objection to
believe that it was also gramnivorous, and drew its
supplies from the vegetable as well as the animal
kingdom.
Upon the whole, we may, with considerable
confidence
,
come to the following conclusions:
1. That the Asiatic and African living elephants
and Siberian mammoth are specifically distinct.
2. That the New-York, Ohio or American
mammoth
is specifically if not generally different from
them.
3. That it was carnivorous, and lived upon the
land.
4. That it may have also been gramnivorous, or
omnivorous and amphibious.
5. And lastly, that it is extinct.
Extract from a letter of Silvanus Miller to De Witt
Clinton:
The first discovery of these fossils was made in
the town of Montgomery, in the county of Orange,
by Rev. Mr. Annin. The place of discovery was in
a sunken and miry meadow, in digging a ditch to
carry off the excess of water. Several of the harder
parts or bones of the mammoth skeleton were
discovered
;
these were the ribs, two teeth (grinders)
and parts of the thigh bone; the teeth and ribs were
in a very sound state, but the others were
considerably
decayed, and an exposure to the air had such an
effect upon them as to render their preservation
useless. Subsequent to that time several scattered
remains of skeletons of the same animal have been
discovered; but from carelessness or other causes
these have been lost. The speculations of persons
who saw these phenomena were various, and in
some instances ridiculous, affording no rational
improvement
to the naturalist. The advancement of
agriculture, which began to show itself in the
counties
of Orange and Ulster at this period, while it
enriched
the husbandman and beautified the country,
was the cause of other discoveries of this nature,
which drew the subject before the public, attracted
the immediate attention of literary men, and led to
the exertions of the enterprising Mr. Peale, of
Philadelphia
,
who procured two skeletons of these
nondescript
animals nearly entire. By the ingenuity
and enterprise of this gentleman these hidden
treasures
of natural history were brought to public
view, to astonish and delight the sons of science.
At the time of this discovery it was my lot to be in
the vicinity, and to contribute my exertions in
taking
them from their hidden depositories. The parts
of these fossils heretofore discovered had excited an
interest far short of their importance. The
numbers
being now increased, and a spirit of inquiry
being set on foot, excited a high degree of public
interest
.
The big bones (as they were called) were
exposed for show, and persons from various
motives
in great numbers flocked to behold this
hitherto
hidden wonder.
The nature and formation of this mammoth
country
,
as well as the particular places where those
animals
were found, may possibly be interesting, and
to this object I shall devote a few general remarks.
The only fossils of this skeleton which have been
discovered, have been found in wet and miry lands
in the towns of Montgomery and Shawangunk. The
former in Orange and the latter in Ulster county, in
this state, distance about 80 miles from this city,
and 6 to 12 miles from Newburgh on the Hudson
river. In a western direction from the Hudson
river for some 5 or 6 miles, the ground rises
gradually
but perceptibly until you come to the confines
of Coldenham; the waters running easterly until
you arrive here, now take the contrary direction,
and turning westerly are disembogued into a
considerable
stream, known by the name of the
Wallkill
and sometimes the Paltz river. On the
highlands
at Coldenham you perceive a range of high
mountains, known by the name of Shawangunk
mountains, from whence the waters run easterly,
and falling into the Wallkill are carried into the
Hudson river at the strand near Kingston, in Ulster
county, about 112 miles distant from New-York.
These mountains on the west, and a ridge of
highlands
on the east, form a natural valley of very
considerable
extent, varying in breadth from 35 in
the southern to the northern extremity of 3 miles
or thereabout. The formation and nature of this
country has nothing to characterize it from other
parts of our state in the middle district. The woods
and forest trees, the grasses and productions of every
kind, are those which are indigenous to various
parts of the state and to all adjacent counties. The
general formation of this country is smooth, marked
by some hills of secondary altitude, is susceptible of
yielding every kind of produce cultivated in
northern
climates. The immense quantities of what is
generally termed Goshen butter, are made in this
valley and on the lands between it and the Hudson
river, extending from New Cornwall, situate at the
northern entrance into the Highlands, to the point
16*
of land called the Dause Kaumer, in the town of
Marlborough. In all this district of country the
pasturage is luxuriant and excellent, and affords
a greedy repast for black cattle, sheep, &c.
It will be seen from this succinct account of the
country, that whether the mammoth delighted in the
fertile plain, in the low and sunken meadow or
swamp, or in the lofty and craggy mountains, or in
all of them, the variety of the soil and formation of
the country, afford a gratification to all his natural
inclinations and propensities. I do not know,
however
,
that the marl discovered in abundance in
Ulster
and Orange counties has been found in their
neighborhood; and it is proper to remark, that in
these sunken receptacles of vegetable and testaceous
solutions, have uniformly been found the bones of
the mammoth. Perhaps it may be said that
in this marl, by its alkaline qualities, have these
fossils alone been preserved from dissolution and
decay. The formation of these has evidently
been the work of ages. In many places the body
of this manure is thirty feet in depth, over which
grass and vegetable plants, common to such grounds,
grew in abundance, interspersed with trees of
different
kinds.
Within a circle, the radius of which does not
exceed
six miles, there are several hundred acres of
marl. A very small proportion of this has been
explored
or dug to the bottom, where the fossil bones
have uniformly been discovered. By the force of
their own weight they have naturally sunk through
the soft marl and found rest many feet below on
solid and harder ground; and yet within the
periphery
of this circle nine skeletons of these
prodigious
animals have been discovered. It may
certainly
be safely computed that not one hundredth
part has been explored to the bottom. If then so
many have been found in so small a proportion of
this
mammoth
ground, and admitting that there has
been great good fortune in falling upon their place
of rest, does it not afford a most reasonable
hypothesis
to say that there are vast numbers of these
natural
curiosities deposited here for future
discoveries
,
and that at some period our country (in this
district) was fully inhabited by this stupendous
animal
;
that in numbers they equalled the other beasts
of the forest, such as the bear, the wolf, the
panther
,
&c., in the proportions which larger animals
bear to the smaller in the order of nature. That
they were carnivorous as well as gramnivorous is
pretty well authenticated by the formation of their
grinders. Indeed, my worthy and learned friend,
Dr. James G. Graham, who examined the fossils,
went still further; for the formation of the bones
near and belonging to the foot, warranted him, as a
professional man, in the belief that this animal had
claws.
Dr. Mitchell appears to have struck upon a
philosophical
explanation, which is at once bold, and
will explain the phenomena. He places these
curiosities
amongst elephantine relics, occasioned by
the change of the axis of the globe 90 at some very
remote period. By this hypothesis may be
explained
the existence of these bones and bodies of
animals
belonging to low and warm latitudes, being
found in cold and frozen climates of the earth. That
gentleman supposes the ancient equator to have
extended
in the northern hemisphere from the bay of
Bengal, near where the mouths of the Ganges are,
through Thibet, Tartary and Siberia to the present
North Pole, and thence along in North America,
through the tracts west of Hudson's Bay and Lake
Superior to the sources of the Mississippi, and thence
down to the Gulf of Mexico, near its places of
disemboguement
,
and so onward across New Spain to
the South Sea. That such was probably the old
equatorial line. In corroboration of this gentleman's
opinion he truly alleges, that under the ancient
equator
have been found the remains of animals peculiar
to warm climates. The bones of the elephant and
the rhinoceros are discovered almost all the way
where he would designate the ancient equator; that
in colder latitudes the frozen bodies themselves, on
the banks of the Genesee and the Lena, and in
masses
of ice lying upon the shores of the Asiatic
continent
and thereabouts, have attracted the attention
of the naturalist; that in America the valley of the
Mississippi was the place of the former equator, in
which direction the fossil skeletons are most
frequent
,
and that the creatures to whom they belong
may be supposed to have perished at the grand
catastrophe
in their proper and natural climates; that
the migration of the human race and the passage of
animals from Asia to America, find a solution by this
theory of easy and rational comprehension. * *
It is important to add, that with the discoveries of
these skeletons have been found considerable locks
and tufts of hair; having been buried a great length
of time in a calcareous substance, it retained its
natural
appearance, and was brought to light in a
tolerable
state of perfection; the length was from one and
a half to two inches and a half, of a dunnish brown
color. In one instance the hair was much longer,
measuring from four to seven inches in length, of the
same color, and resembling in appearance the
shorter
,
and was conjectured to have been the mane of the
mammoth. Whether a discoloration had not taken
place from its native appearance must remain a
matter
of conjecture. In every instance an exposure to
air caused it to moulder away into a kind of
impalpable
dust. This fact would seem to render it certain
that the animal, the relics of whose body were here
found, appertained to a race totally different from
any elephants now known to naturalists.
To bring down our brief on Behemoth to the
present moment, we give a paragraph which
appeared
in a New-York paper (The Evening Star) of
February 8th:
The Bones of the Mastodon at Auction
.It would
appear that the bones of the head of the American
Mastodon, which were, until lately, a desideratum
that all zoologists anxiously awaited the discovery
of, have been permitted by our learned societies to
leave this country. We have now the humiliating
consolation to know that these most rare and
valuable
relics of this antediluvian monster, have been
hawked about the streets of London, until finally
knocked down dog-cheap under the hammer of a
cockney auctioneer. So much for the love, the
ardor
of our scientific association for the promotion of
the study of natural history! It is discreditable
that such precious treasures should have been thus
abandoned. We said so at the time; but it seems
there was not spirit enough to keep the bones of
our own proud king of the forest among us. It is
an enigma we cannot solve, how the idiot of an
owner
never thought to go to Paris with his osteological
speculation. There they are interested in what
relates
to our animals, fossils, &c.; and Cuvier, if
alive, would have been in ecstacies to have seen the
head of that Mastodon which he christened with this
name. The fine cranium with the upper jaw and
teeth brought only 100 francs. The head perfect,
44 inches long and 28 wide brought, however, 3,822
francs, i. e., near $750, which was not a tenth part
of its value; and that it is probably the only one that
has ever been discovered or ever probably may be.
We believe it came from Kentucky. Almost
always
the head is found wanting, though the teeth
and leg bones are remarkably sound. The giant
quadruped that bounded over the prairies little
dreamed of the destiny that awaited him.
Note (3)p. 121.
Without pretending to adopt the opinions or
conjectures
that follow, I quote them as expressing the
views of an eminent man, and as embodying a
plausible
explanation of the settlement of this country.
They are quoted from Priest's Antiquities:
The following is from the pen of the late William
Wirt, of Virginia, on the subject of the ancient
inhabitants
of this country: `Mr. Flint and other
travellers
and sojourners in the West, state that the
impress of the leaves of the bread fruit tree, and the
bamboo, have frequently been found in peat-bed and
fossil coal formations in the neighborhood of the
Ohio. Pebbles of disruption, vast masses of lead
ore far from the mine, stratified rocks, earth and
sand, and specimens of organic animal and
vegetable
remains, belonging to a tropical climate, clearly
indicate some important and extensive changes
occasioned
by fire or water in the whole great valley
of the Mississippi. Then the regular walls, the
bricks, the medals, the implements of iron and
copper
,
buried in a soil which must have been
undisturbed
for ages, with the alphabetic characters
written
on the cliffs, plainly show that other races of men
have existed and passed away. And what a world
must that have been, when the mammoth and the
megalonyx trod the plains, and monstrous lizards,
whose bones are now rescued from the soil, and
which must have been at least eighty feet in length,
reared their heads from the rivers and the lakes!
The mighty remains of the past, to which we have
alluded, indicate the existence of three distinct races
of men, previous to the arrival of the white settlers.
The monuments of the
first
or primitive race, are
regular stone walls, well stoned up, brick hearths,
found in digging the Louisville canal, medals of
copper
,
and silver swords, and other implements of
iron. Mr. Flint assures us that he has seen these
strange ancient swords. He has also examined a
small iron shoe, like a horse shoe, encrusted with
the rust of ages, and found far below the soil, and the
copper axe weighing about two pounds, singularly
tempered and of peculiar construction. These
relics
,
he thinks, belonged to a race of civilized men,
who must have disappeared many centuries ago. To
this race he attributes the hieroglyphic characters
found on the limestone bluffs; the remains of cities
and fortifications of Florida; the regular banks of
ancient live oaks near them, and the bricks found at
Louisville, nineteen feet below the surface, in
regular
hearths, with the coals of the last domestic fire
upon them. These bricks were hard and regular,
and longer in proportion to their width than those
of the present day.
To the second race of beings are attributed the
vast mounds of earth, found throughout the whole
western region, from Lake Erie and west
Pennsylvania
to Florida and the Rocky Mountains. Some
of them contain skeletons of human beings, and
display
immense labor. Many of them are regular
mathematical figuresparallelograms and sections
of circles, showing the remains of gateways and
subterranean
passages. Some of them are eighty feet
high, and have trees grown on them apparently of
the age of five hundred years. They are generally
of a soil differing from that which surrounds them,
and they are most common in situations where it
since has been found convenient to build towns and
cities. One of these mounds was levelled in the
centre of Chilicothe, and cart loads of human bones
removed from it. Another may be seen in
Cincinnati
,
in which a thin circular piece of gold, alloyed
with copper, was found last year. Another in St.
Louis, called the falling garden, is pointed out to
strangers as a great curiosity. Many fragments of
earthenware, some of curious workmanship, have
been dug throughout this vast region. Some
represented
drinking vessels, some human heads, and
some idols. They all appear to be moulded by the
hand and hardened in the sun. These mounds and
earthen implements indicate a race inferior to the
first, which was acquainted with the use of iron.
The
third
race are the Indians, now existing in
the western territories. In the profound silence and
solitude of these western regions, and above the
bones of a buried world, how must a philosophic
traveller
meditate upon the transitory state of human
existence, when the only traces of the beings of two
races of men are these strange memorials! On this
very spot, generation after generation has stood, has
lived, has warred, grown old, and passed away; and
not only their names, but their nation, their
language
,
has perished, and utter oblivion has closed
over their once populous abodes! We call this
country the New World. It is old! Age after age,
and one physical revolution after another, has passed
over it, but who shall tell its history?
THE END.